1: I am begging whoever is reading this, DO NOT TAKE THIS. I've been on any and every antidepressant you can think of, and I've never had the withdrawals I am still currently dealing with - and I was on this for less than 6 months at 75 mg.
There was no forewarning before starting the medication, and when informing my doctor that the benefits didn't outweigh the side effects, she finally explained that I may go through withdrawals. I'm quite sensitive to side effects, so I expected to feel like garbage for a couple of days. 
I'm now on day 9 of being unable to work due to the withdrawals, which tapering did nothing to help. Do you know how embarrassing it is to sob at 29 years old because your body is shaking so much, the smell of RICE making you sick, your body can't tell if it's hot or cold, you can't physically speak or process what people are saying to you, and nothing you've done in the past can help even 20%? Everything I'm somehow able to eat two bites of comes right back out. I'm a chronic migraine sufferer, but this heightened it to a point I wanted to scream.

I know it can help, I know they have found positive results for people, but the moment you are late to take a dose or try to get off of this, any positive will go out the window.Read More Read Less
2: I was prescribed Venlafaxine to treat GAD and mild depression after trying Celexa and Lexapro with little success. I experienced a bit of increased anxiety at first but am now at week 5 and seeing some improvement. No side effects other than the initial increased anxiety. Staying at 75 MG for now, may increase to 150 if necessary.
3: Have been on this med for 1.5 yrs after 6 yrs on wellbutrin which quit working. the first 2-3 days i was a zombie but came back and for about the first year was very happy w the results. actually felt happy every now and then which unfortunately is rare. but after about a year had depressive episode w suicidal thoughts coming back. went to md and had dosage upped to 75 mg and have been doing that ok for about 3 mths. Still have low days w lots of fatigue, NO interest in doing anything, no sex drive whatsoever, have gained 45 lbs, and very irritable. also not sleeping well and having hot flashes. gonna keep track of low days and see if i dont need to find something else.Read More Read Less
4: i have ptsd from going to iraq, zoloft didnt work and niether did anything else...but this med is working pretty well in conjunction with clododine and cyriquil
5: This is only my second weak on the medication and I'm so tired, a bit nauseous, a bit off balance, headaches, every symptom that was mentioned. I was told about this so I'm not too worried. I'm more agitated and anxious. I'm going that goes away soon. Any suggestions?
6: This drug has helped me tremendously. I would recommend trying it. No side effects at all.Will stay on iy the rest of my life.
7: I have a concern that the generic (Venlafaxine) is less effective than the Effexor. The XR effect seems to be shorter. I'd like to see other ratings of this comparison.
8: I’ve suffered of depression, chronic pain and light adhs. After starting with the treatment with Venlafaxine I started to feel a general numbness, which I first found positive, because I no longer suffered from any stomach pain at all. For the last couple of years I’ve been suffering from chronic stomach pain after several stomach surgeries to treat hiatal hernias. 
Within days, the pain completely disappeared! Which was great. But, unfortunately, I started to get extremely tired and struggled more and more to get through the day. My doctor asked me to be patient and to try to go through with it a little longer and to take the medication at night instead of in the morning. This helped for a week. 
After that I felt more and more numb and like a zombie. I went from needing 6-7 hours of sleep to needing 10 hours at night and 3-4 hours during the day. Exercise would help me to feel awake for a couple of hours. Or loads of sugar and carbs. Within 3 months I gained nearly 5 kg.
I was unable to concentrate and started to avoid social interactions as I found it tiring and frightening.
Quitting causes a lot of stress, anxiety, sweating and headache.Read More Read Less
9: I took this drug for 3-4 months and kept getting strange bouts of nausea I called my doctor to lower the dosage and she cut in 1/2 still had vomiting/nausea issues. Decided I could not do this anymore and went off the drug. HORRIBLE side effects when trying to get off the meds. Severe nausea and vomiting, diarrhea sweats headache. This is a horrible drug YES is takes away and helps with my anxiety but not worth the vomiting mid-day and constant issues.
10: Life-changing, life-saving. I was prescribed 150 mg a day of the regular (not XR) form 18 years ago. I started feeling much better right away -- far less anxious and sad. The only downside is I can space out just enjoying my random happy thoughts so I need to remind myself to get back to getting things done -- but that's not too hard and way better than being sad and scared all the time. Once when I was sick (for other reasons) I couldn't keep the venlafaxine pills down which made me unintentionally go off it cold turkey, which gave me nightmares until I could get it to stay down again. That scared me so I weaned myself -- VERY SLOWLY! IMPORTANT! -- down to 75 mg a day, so now if I forget to take them I only get really sad and anxious ( no nightmares) until I get back on it. I also went off it on purpose -- VERY SLOWLY -- and stayed off for a year to see if maybe I didn't need it anymore. It was a horribly anxious year. I felt a million percent better when I went back on it. Because I take the regular form, I have never had the "brain zaps" or other weirdness associated with the XR form. A relative takes venlafaxine with results like mine; I think we have a genetic brain wiring issue that it mends. I am infinitely grateful this medicine exists and sad for all the people with this condition who were sad and scared every day before this was invented -- or who still are because they can't afford it. It is not for every depressed or anxious person -- I read that each medication only helps a small percent (but a different group usually) of all patients, but at least this helps some of us.Read More Read Less
11: The doctor gave me this med after klonopin didnt work for my panic/ anxiety issues. I took this medication for 1 week. I either vomitted or was nausous that entire week. I had no energy and my panic/ anxiety attacks became more frequent and worse. I had to wean myself down off of them and the withdrawls were horrible.
12: This drug has been extremely effective for me, however, I am concerned about using a Nicotine patch with it to quit smoking. Could you please tell me the benefits and the dangers of using the patch with this medication?
13: Starting having problems w/ depression along with the onset of lupus and fibro. I took this with good results for several years, before my rheum. decided to switch me to Cymbalta. He said to just stop taking the Effexor, and I am furious that he told me that. After a week, I still have horrible side effects trying to withdraw from this medicine. Nauseous constantly, terrible headache, dizzy, sweating constantly, mood is aggressive and nasty. How can prescribe these poisons to people?
14: I started taking Venlafaxine 2 weeks ago. The last 3 days I have been able to tell the difference in a great, great way.    I had been suffering insomnia, OCD habits, and extreme anxiety attacks every other week on average.  After a 12 hour anxiety attack I cut off my hair with a crayola brand scissors and went to the doctor the next day. I'm giving this information to characterize how extreme my anxiety attacks were getting. I didn't feel like I was in my own body anymore. I felt out of my mind, out of control. This had been happening since June 2011. I went to the doctor finally September 2012. I am now falling asleep when I want to fall asleep, I haven't had an anxiety attack and I don't feel anxious at all, and I feel like I can control my OCD habits. The last is still strugglesome but I believe that I can do it now. I have coherent thoughts. I tell myself "just one thing at a time" and I can do it. I have comlete control over my actions and behavior. I'm getting my online schooling done early, not last minute. Everything is going great.     As for side effects - the first 4 days I was sicker than hell. (stomach wise) So, if you are ready to start taking Venlafaxine, I recommend not to do so on the beginning of a work week. Instead, try starting on a saturday or a day off of work. Take it in the morning. Drink a full tall glass of water with each dose and something else in your stomach for it to absorb.     I hope that this medication works for anyone reading this as much as it has for me. I am so happy that I decided to go to the doctor. I have control over my life now and I am very optimistic about my future. I plan to stay on this medication until I finish my bachelors degree
15: Withdrawals are TERRIBLE, even if your does is only late, and not missed. Not worth it at all.
16: Major reduction in my depression
17: I've had depression and anxiety since I was a small child. I've tried several different medications for my mental health. Most have not worked for me, and Venlafaxine is one of them. Not a big surprise there, as we're all different and medications don't work for everyone. What I truly hated about this medication was the withdrawal symptoms. Even weaning off while slowly upping the dose of a new medication made me extremely sick.
18: I was put on this for hot flashes and now was put on estrogen. I cannot get off this medication because of the brain zaps! It makes me sick. I wish I never had taken this medication I dont know how to get off it and I only had a very low dose.
19: I have depression and severe social anxiety. And this medicine changed me. I'm more social.  I'm not having bad thoughts anymore about all and nothing. I'm back to being myself. But it doesn't come without inconvenience. First you have to read the instructions who comes with it and they are scary (side effects...etc) I had to pass it on to my partner so he can read it and be aware of my condition to be prepare if any problems accured. It takes 2 to 3weeks to show effects. During these 2 to 3 weeks : dizziness, nausea, tiredness, but after that period it works really well. 
But I found that we need to have a really healthy life. Take the meds at the same time everyday no matter what, otherwise nauseas show up. No alcohol, no drugs. Eating healthy and doing some exercise is a booster and it is really good, I use yoga and it works for me. Also you might need some time to find what is the right dose for you. I had 75mg and it was too much, I felt worse so I take half and add some exercise on top and I found my perfect balance. If I drink 2 pints of beer I'm drunk and the next day I don't feel right. One is manageable so it permits me to go socialize for an hour in the pub and then go home a little. But I wouldn't drink everyday with these meds. If you are not disciplined it can quickly make this worse. But it works with some willing power, with love to ye all.Read More Read Less
20: I was prescribed low dosage of Effexor 1 1/2 yrs ago for hot flashes.  It was like turning off the faucet and added benefit, it helped with my moods.  Last May I had a total hysterectomy. It no longer completely helped with hot flashes; my gyno added a low dosage of estrogen patch.  The combination has worked great.  I rotate between Effexor XR and generic, because of the difference in cost.  I have had great success.  I have always been slightly depressed but I never mentioned it to a dr.  When I was able to go on Effexor, I was very pleased in the difference I felt; the added relief of the hot flashes was a bonus.  I am a 55 yr old female and am very happy with the medication.  I hope this helps someone going through menapause.Read More Read Less
21: Used Effexor 10 years ago, then no insurance, switched to Prozac. Now on Medicare (disabled), back to Venlafaxine for 7 years. My current dose is 450 mg per day.  That's right. One 150mg pill in the morning, two at night. Upped to 450 after depression got bad again. Now I rarely sleep, but would give up my right arm if I could. Still depressed, but lack the energy to kill myself. If I screw up taking it on time, then you can mark 1 or 2 days off the calendar, bc I'm so tired I'm incoherent. Not sleeping tho. Just sitting around like a bowl of jello. Sounds terrible, but it is the lesser evil. See PCP next month and am going to make some changes. IF I remember, that is. Other daily meds-(3)15mg morphine for back/hip pain, levothyroxine for thyroid, pravastatin for cholesterol and nabumetone
22: Increased sweating, nervousness, panic attakcs.
23: my heart rate is high. my blood pressure is high, i have numbness. blurred vision, tired and many more bad symptoms
24: It has worked well for my anxiety attacks.  Although, I am getting frightened to take it. (300mg daily) I donot take the SR. Is it dangerous?
25: I have taken this for a long time and didnt take it for two days and had horrible withdraws. I do NOT recommend this to anyone. I am really worried about taking this medicine.
26: Initially this drug seemed to work but It got to the point that I could not sleep at night. I then loss my appetite and had to force myself to eat. This was dangerous for me because I am a diabetic. Sometimes I would go all day without eating.
27: I was on this drug for almost 5 years and over the last 6 months or so I decided to switch. I realized I was extremely fatigued, would get random dizzy spells, more frequent anxiety (crazy right), and just didn't feel like myself. Maybe the drug just stopped working, who knows. I was on only 75 mg but not willing to increase my dose!!! Also transitioning off the drug was NOT fun... pretty much two weeks of hell. However I am off the drug now and would not recommend it to anyone else. Also if you miss a dose - brain zaps!!!! Gross.Read More Read Less
28: worked well at first but now I think I need something different for hot flashes, I've tried so many different treatments.
29: I was put on this drug 3 months ago for severe depression and night terrors from the war. I love it, im on 150mg a day and besides sweating a little bit more than usual and it takes a little bit longer to urinate i feel its a great drug.
30: I have been on this drug for approximately 18 months.   I started taking because of seasonal depression and am the heaviest I have ever been in my life.   I have picked up 35 lbs while taking this drug.   When I initially starting taking this, I took it in the morning and it made me VERY tired.   I switched to taking it right before bed and that worked out well for me.  I have experience a serious increase in sweating and hot flashes.   When I miss a dose, get out of my way.   Serious dizziness and I have a hairpin trigger for getting pissed off.  I have been trying for three weeks to get off of this drug (by a gradual reduction in dosage) during the summer and the only thing I can say is the physical withdrawal I am experiencing is beyond severe.  Short temper, episodes of increased anger, dizziness and nausea, sleeplessness,   I am contemplating staying on the drug to avoid the withdrawal symptoms.    You have to decide which is worse, the depression or the side effects of the drug, if they apply to you
31: This medicine comes with unbearable side effects which is cannot be described in words, it starts a never-ending series of discomforts, after taking the first dose the blood pressure shot too high, even I was not a patient of high blood pressure medicines for lower down blood pressure are not working against this horrible medicine, even I was finally thining for taking emergency pills for preventing heart failure, felling extreme chill and shivering, I spent the whole night warming my hands in front of the stove. Think thousand times before taking this medicine.Read More Read Less
32: I was on a 75mg XR dose for about 3 years for menopausal symptoms: hot flashes and insomnia. After a few days of headache, dizziness and nausea, it worked brilliantly. I took it before bed, and my sleep was better than it had ever been, and fewer hot flashes. I was groggy in the evenings though and not good for much after supper.
I have tapered off of it very slowly, first alternating 75 and 37.5mg for a couple of weeks, then 37.5mg only for a couple of weeks. Skipping a 37.5 dose was too hard, so I went with opening the capsule and counting beads, 2 fewer each day, all the way down to 5 beads (yes, tedious and time-consuming). My evening energy has definitely increased, but the detox headaches, dizziness, flu-like feeling and irritated mood have been uncomfortable throughout the withdrawal period (worst close to the time of day for the dose). I took my last micro-dose 3 days ago, and I think the side effects are finally easing. Fortunately, no brain zaps for me.Read More Read Less
33: A month into this effexor crap and i landed in jail for 90 days w
Ith a felony domestic violence charge. STAY AWAY FROM VENLAFAXINE(EFFEXOR).. TERRIBLE TERRIBLE STUFF. IT LITERALLY RUINED MY LIFE.  Then when doing the 90 days i was forced to cold turkey quit..the most traumatizing experience of my life. Horrible horrible nighmares, massive sweating, racing thoughts of suicide, major depression set in, body shocks like high voltage electricity through my legs and chest, sometimes in my eyes.Amplified anxiety, depression, suicidal thoughts. Killed my appetite. Dr. Might as well of prescribed me meth.  I will never ever put anything like that in my body, ever,  ever again
34: Venlafaxine XL slow release 75mg dose. I have fibromyalgia, front line drugs to assist with pain are antidepressants or sedatives, over the years I have gradually learnt the triggers or factors surrounding my personal condition, they include Anxiety and Depression, 
The drugs, It is about a 1-10 chance which drug is going to work for you but not the next person its that fickle, one persons bad review may be your chance of improvement.
In my experience their is no complete fix, personal side effects with all the drugs you take because of your own bodies tolerance to the substance.
This drug venlafaxine XL is a slow release, it help with overall wellbeing, lowers my anxiety, depression, still have some IBS at times, this is a low dose but it gives me some release from GAD, for me if I can keep the Anxiety and depression at bay it enables me to live life a bit better,

Pain still persists, fatigue is a little lower although I have learnt to pace myself.
Hope this helps others??Read More Read Less
35: I've been taking Venlafaxine for a few weeks now for my anxiety/depression/panic attacks.  I have noticed an improvement in mood and energy level.  It makes me a little nauscious and light-headed when I take it so I take it with a meal to reduce those symptoms.  At this point I would say the benefits outweigh those mild side effects.  One other weird thing: Huge loss of appetite.  I still eat healthfully, but I'm just not as obsessed with food as I used to be.  I've lost a lot of weight.  So far I would recommend it  :)Read More Read Less
36: I feel better and want to do things again.
37: This is the 3rd pill the Dr prescribed to me for General Axiety and Panic Attacks. Zoloft Paxil and now this generic venlafaxine have all made me worse. Zoloft being the worst and now this one gives me the worst headache. Either I'm up all night or I can't sleep. I have nightmares. I sweat like crazy at night. It says to take with food but it takes away your appetite so you go 2 days not eating only to lay in bed naseaus with diareaha. Xanax is the only thing that helps though I was told it's only a crutch and won't help with my panic attacks long term. After this pill my doctor gave up on me and told me to see a phyciatrist. Depression & Anxiety pills are not for most people. I suggest everyone read up on all reviews on all drugs prescribed becuase all of these just make me worse. :( Read More Read Less
38: I just started
39: This drug absolutely turned my life around & quickly,too. My nightmares and overwhelming fears faded away.My life was becoming normal again.  The downside was, I had to eventually quit it, only because I couldn't afford it. My Dr. was giving me boxes of the drug for several years. He moved and my new Dr. has given me cheaper drugs that just don't compare.
40: I started taking this due to long standing depression.  I had tried a few of the popular ones to no improved effect, but now after two months+ on this I am seeing the subtale change for the positive, I had been looking for.
41: I have been taking Effexor for over a year for Migraines however my doctor switched me to this generic and it has been terrible. Effexor has helped me so much however the generic gives me complete insomnia. I went over 2 weeks without being able to sleep. My doctor but me on sleeping pills and recommended me to go back on effexor. Now I can sleep again. I am going to convince my doctor to allow me to stay of effexor now. I can't believe no one else is having sleep problems with this medication. If you are please post it. Thank youRead More Read Less
42: within 2 days, i no longer had night sweats.  it has also calmed my anxiety.
43: I asked my doctor to prescribe me antidepressants and he prescribed me venlafaxine. I did experience insomnia, headaches, and small appetite in the beginning when taking this medicine. I started off with the minimum 37.5mg dose and increased it to 75mg after a month. The sudden increase led to suicidal thoughts and intense physical side effects. Though my doctor insisted that I take the drug for longer, I decided to get off the drug after 2 months after reading some reviews online. I just felt so tired and washed out all the time. The withdrawal was terrible. I couldn't go to school for a week. Constant migraines, nausea, dizziness, and no willpower. I was fortunate enough to only be taking the medicine for 2 months before I got off. I don't know how the withdrawals are for those who have been taking the drug for over a year. Now that I'm off, I feel like my mood has soared in the opposite direction and I'm a lot more awake/aware of my surroundings. REALLY don't recommend taking venlafaxine. It is not worth the side effects.Read More Read Less
44: In less than 2 months, I feel back to normal. Side effects are manageable.
45: This medicine makes me nervous, angry, empty feeling inside, I have been on it for a month. Can someone PLEASE tell me how to get my self off of this, I am scared of the side effects. I take 75 mg. Please Help me..
46: ok to take regular
47: Suggested use for hot flashes due to Estrogen feed cancer.  Prior to use having several episodes of hot flashes, w/Venlafaxine, starting at 37mg, now 150, maybe 1 hot flash, mostly none.   So far, working.   No complaints, no detectable other s/e's.
48: The first few days I started the medication I was very nauseaus. Now I am fine with it. The only side effect I'm having is losing weight(no appetite) I've lost 10 pounds. I am down to 118. I seem to have a little more energy. I'm on my second month so I haven't seen a significant change in my depression yet. I know it takes time. I missed a dose one day and the next day I was sick. Overall I'm satisfied so far.
49: PLEASE BEWARE OF THE HORRIBLE WITHDRAWL SYMPTOMS OF THIS MEDICATION WHEN/IF YOU DISCONTINUE IT. I AM GOING THROUGH MAJOR, SERIOUS WITHDRAWL SYMPTOMS FROM ABRUPTLY STOPPING THE MEDICATION AND IT IS AT TIMES UNBEARABLE TO DEAL WITH. I HAVEN'T SLEPT AN ENTIRE NIGHT THOUGH IN OVER 13 DAYS NOW, THE HORRIBLE HEADACHES, VERTIGO, SHAKING, RAPID HEARTBEAT/TACYCARDIA, HORRIBLE SWEATING (I AM HAVING TO CHANGE MY CLOTHES TWICE A NIGHT BECAUSE I END UP COVERED IN SWEAT) WEAKNESS, AGITATION & IRRITABILITY (I AM AFRAID TO LEAVE THE HOUSE BECAUSE OF AN INTERACTION WITH ANOTHER PERSON COULD BE A BAD THING IF I GET PROVOKED OR FEEL PROVOKED FOR THAT MATTER I COULD VERY WELL SNAP VERY EASILY) UNCONTROLLABLE CRYING SPELLS, CHILLS, INSOMNIA, NAUSEA AND THE FACT THAT I JUST FEEL LIKE A ZOMBIE AND JUST FEEL VERY OUT OF IT, I AM VERY HOSTILE AND ANGRY AND THESE SIDE EFFECTS FROM GETTING OFF THIS MEDICATION ARE JUST HORRIBLE AND I REALLY PRAY THAT NOBODY ELSE OUT THERE HAS WENT THROUGH THIS BEFORE AND THAT NOBODY ELSE WILL EVER EXPERIENCE THE UTTER PURE HELL I HAVE BEEN GOING THROUGH THE LAST 2 WEEKS OF MY LIFE. PLEASE BE AWARE OF THIS BECAUSE I CAN ASSURE YOU THAT YOU DO NOT WANT TO GO THROUGH ANY OF WHAT I HAVE BEEN DEALING WITH. GOD BLESS ALL THAT SUFFER FROM DEPRESSION AND MAY WE ALL BE HEALED OF IT COMPLETELY SOMEDAY
50: evering was wonderfull, hardly any panic atacks, exiety was disapating with every day, i have even been able to go back to collega, then I stoped talking the meds for to weeks dr put me back on same dose and i Over dosed or O.D.thank god i didnt go into a coma and im still alive, i still want to be on this med. it helps me that much
51: Taking Venlafaxine is my 3rd attempt at depression medication.  I started out with Celexa but had her switch me bc I gained a large amount of weight.  My dr then prescribed me Wellbutrin.  I was horribly allergic to it.  She now has put me on Venlafaxine...it has been only 2 days and so far I've experienced ALOT of side effects.  Not sure if they will continue to be bothersome, but felt compelled to let others know about them.  Nausea...it is horrible.  Even after eating something prior to taking it, had me on my toes for the bathroom.  Didnt get sick, but the feeling was strong enough to head towards the bathroom constantly.  2nd of all, I couldnt sleep last night.  I was tired, but my eyes were racing and didnt seem to want to shut.  3rd-my pupils look like cat eyes.  I am also foggy, feeling somewhat numb....I hope it gets better, cuz this is only day 2Read More Read Less
52: I am pretty sure my doctor hates me cuz there is no other explanation why she would put me on this nightmare of a drug. My first noticable side effect is vertigo and leg shakes I can be standing still and it feels like the floor drops . then I started to have uti's never had problems with them in my life . I used to be a fun person now I am just here I don't get the happiness highs but this medication is great at making me have super lows . I have gained 20 lbs lost my job and I am starting to wean off I went from 150 mg to 75 mg no side affects so far still scared to death of the chance there might be and i will be stuck in this nightmareRead More Read Less
53: It really helped my anxiety, but I'm still getting bad hot flashes that make me feel ill.  I need to go lay down nude under my ceiling fan for half an hour.  Then I'm ok. If I miss it for more than a couple days I get a strange dizziness, almost like when I move my eyes my vision "shakes", like when you quickly move a video camera.  And, that makes me feel sick.  Menopause sucks.
54: After my father passed away I became severely depressed. My Dr. prescribed three different SSRI's but they were not effective. Prescribed this and it has been a lifesaver. You MUST take it regularly for more than a month to six months so everyone who reviewed this after only using it briefly does not realize the full benefit of the medication.
55: Started taking this med for depression and anixiety because of the stress that I am under most of the time. Started at 300 mg a day and now down to 150 mg before bed. Helps me sleep through the night. Also taking Bupropion SR (generic Wellburtin)350 mg a day and Xannax 1mg a day. Lost of sex drive from the antidepressants, but helping me deal with the stress.
56: I am a war vet and suffer from severe PTSD and major depression. This medication really works, but if I miss a dose I seem to get very aggrivated and I get minor headaches daily.
57: For me this has worked very well. I get over heated at times, which is the pits when having hot flashes, but a small price to pay for having my depression under control. I feel so much better.
58: I would rather be depressed then use this medication again. Felt every side effect, plus my hands keep going numb/tingling.
59: I have seen really great changes since starting this.  I was on lexapro years ago.  I have a very bad attitude and temper problem.  I have been told I am pleasant to be around now.  I do feel better because I am not upset about minor situations now.  I let them roll.  The only side affects I have had are the night sweating and the nightmares, but that is a small price to pay for my happiness and everyone around me.
60: As a person with an eating disorder in my background I never should have used this medication.  My appetite disappeared instantly and my weight plummeted.  It eventually cost me a very hard hospital stay to recover. In addition I do not feel it helped it's intended use at all.
61: This medication made me more agitated overall, my general practitioner simply increased my dosage. It did not help. I weened off of it myself and now I am 3 months into Discontinuation Syndrome. This drug is NOT WORTH IT. I cannot think, I have emotional episodes and no one warned me of this discontinuation syndrome...it is awful.
62: Also, here is an effective way to quit: 

Titrate down from your current dose by 37.5 mg every two weeks. Or every week if you haven’t been on the medication very long. Then, once you’ve reached 37.5 mg, stay on that for two weeks. Then, continue on this same dose EVERY OTHER day for two weeks BUT, take one dose (pill) of Prozac at 20mg after the first week. Then, stop the Effexor altogether. This is a conservative, slow approach but greatly minimizes the withdrawal. Please consult with your psychiatrist first but this is a very effective method. Be well.Read More Read Less
63: Depression. Terrible results.
64: I began taking 75mg twice daily for anxiety and depression. Within first week, felt improved. After that side effects of dizziness, disassociation, lethargy, and extensive sleeping kicked in. I miss work all the time because I can't wake up and when I do, I feel disoriented. I cut back to 37.5mg once daily and noticed a very small improvement. Currently working with my doctor to find something else.  This is the first time I have had issues like these with a drug and it scares me. I really plan to research the next drug I am prescribed before I begin taking it!Read More Read Less
65: Changed med from Zoloft with Wellbutrin.  After 3 weeks, jittery and headaches - no upturn with the depression/anxiety yet.  Told to keep taking this for full 6 weeks to see if this combination will work for me.
66: I've only been on this medication a short period of time at this point. However,I'm feeling much better. The hot flashes is gone,sleep well at night and my mood swings is MUCH BETTER, my side effects has been minimum.
67: side effects, horrid smell to urine, tinitus, insomnia
68: JUST STARTING
69: I was diagnosed with major depression, anxiety, OCD and PTSD about a year ago. I'd dealt with it for years before breaking. Sertraline caused emotional "numbness" plus a load of side effects, and didn't help much. Citalopram made me very unwell indeed - I managed three tiny doses.

Venlafaxine was a game-changer. Nine months on (225mg/day) and there are now no side effects, but huge benefits. I feel much more like myself again, which is a real novelty after over a decade of suffering. The issues I was experiencing are slowly diminishing day by day.

Don't worry about trying it - your doctor knows what they're doing. Don't expect issues, but if they occur, you'll find ways around it if this is the right medicine for you. If it isn't, there WILL be one that is. If it is, you won't look back! Read More Read Less
70: I've been on Effexor for close to 5 years, and it has helped tremendously with my depression and social anxiety. The best dosage of the XR for me was 112.5 mg (higher dosages caused me to nap during the day and also caused constipation). I switched to the generic Venlafaxine, 100 mg. a day, in late summer 2007 and continued to do very well. But, over the last few months I found that when I took my pill it seemed to be hitting me harder during the first couple hours...I would feel "buzzed" in a way. I also found that the mild hot spells I always had with it were getting worse, especially at night. I have been reducing my intake over the last three weeks or so, and have had no change at all in my moods, and it's reducing the side effects. I am working towards getting off it entirely, and want to explore more natural treatments if needed.Read More Read Less
71: This drug is very effective for treating my depression.  HOWEVER, the withdrawal effects are HORRIBLE.  Whenever I have accidentally forgotten to take a dose, one of the first things I experience is what could best be described as an "electric pulse" going up the back of my neck to the base of my skull.  I then begin to feel physically ill, and eventually will vomit.  Weakness, fatigue and a lack of sex drive are all side effects I have dealt with while taking this medication.  I have slowly been decreasing the dosage (with my doctor's help) from 100 mg to 75 mg, and am now at 50 mg.  My goal is to stop taking it altogether at some point, but I can't simply "quit" this drug.Read More Read Less
72: My back pain use to wake me up at night.  I woke up every morning with pain. Since taking Venlafaxine my back pain is virtually gone. I experienced no side effects.
73: Used for: Depression, mood changes, irritability, hostile/angry feelings/actions.    This worked very well for suppressing most of my conditions, but not 100% like I would like it to.  I started out on 50 mg, move up over 6 months to 150 mg I am currently at now and have noticed the side effects are drastically effecting my everyday life.    It has reduced the overall amount of panic attacks, and my depression to a manageable point. But has worsening my anxiety levels, I get daily hot flashes/sweats, impulsive actions, severe restlessness, and very rapid speech to name a few.    I have sever Sleep Apnea and since starting this, my overall amount of sleep has decreased from 6.75 hrs. a night to 4 hrs. or less a night. Even with taking Ambient CR 12.5 mg it doesn't help.    As with any medication, it effects everyone differently, I'm only posting this info so it might help someone else.    I'm currently researching if I should lower my current 150 mg dose and add BuSpar. Hopefully I can figure out a balance.    Read More Read Less
74: Was on 8 years with great success. It really works!!! Decided to get off- bad idea!!! Went back on and it's working again. Great stuff for anxiety and depression. Try it and don't give up!!
75: started with effexor xr, 3 years just changes to generic because of cost. hate it I fell dizzy nauseated,a little out of sorts. extremely tired. never was with the xr
76: I was prescribed Effexor (before the generic venlafaxine was avail) 3 years ago for hot flashes.  I had a stroke at age 45 caused by HRT and have not been able to take anything for fear of a re-occurance of the TIA. When I took a leap of faith and started my own business, (didn't have insurance) I was not able to afford this medication (no generic was avail) so I stopped taking it, (HUGE MISTAKE), it was working for the hot flashes, and also the mood swings, DO NOT STOP COLD TURKEY........I went into a semi psychotic state of mind for about 6 months, which ultimately cost me more than just my health issues, including the love of my life of 27 years, we ended up splitting up because of my "episodes".  I am now back on the medication and feel like a fog was lifted, it curbs the hot flashes, mood swings, and I am hoping to rebuild the damage from the moods that caused me to be for lack of a better word a total bitch to everyone around me.  Again, I find the med effective, but DO NOT stop without working with your Dr.Read More Read Less
77: I have really bad anxiety and serve depression. It started around 9 yrs old till now. This drug has helped me somewhat and I've been taking 150mg every day for about 6 months
78: I was prescribed Effexor XR and have been taking it for several years and it has worked very well for me. The prescription company that I get it from, would send me 90 day supplies at a time and I would just reorder it when the time came. This time when I reordered it, they sent me this generic version. After taking it for 3-4 weeks I find that my mood has taken a turn for the worst. Every little thing upsets me. This did not happen when I took Effexor. These generic drugs should be more closely monitored to make certain that they work EXACTLY the way name brand does. This is very unfair to the patients.Read More Read Less
79: as it is mandatory to rate this medication i have put 4stars in hope,as i started it only yesterday,i have been ill since 1998,tried so many meds its not funny,&at last been offered something entirely different in efexor XL.after all verions of fluoxitine based meds to mitrazapine i believed i may as well be dead,but i now have hope,regardless of the negative comments re side-effects reported by users,partly by desperation,partly thru knowing everyone is different.although i am apprehensive starting this therapy,i am of the opinion'nothing ventured nothing gained'. anything is worth a try as life as i know it cannot be so much worse for giving efexor a trial at least surely?my doctor has given me 28 pills modified release 1x75mg daily,and thank you all for your feedback i am at least pre-warned of possible problems i may encounter from side-effects to sudden withdrawal.to everybody who has taken time out to comment on this drug may i thank you for your selflessness,and may you find some peace &harmony in your futures,bless you,cathie liverpool,UKRead More Read Less
80: I had severe pain in my big toe of rt foot and both heels pained badly.( i had suffered for 10 long years with heel pain)The bone around my heel and most bone in my both foot pained lot.Tons of NASAIDS AND STEROIDS DID NOT HELP ME.After taking Venlafaxine HCL ER 37.50 MG(MFG:TEVA) my pain disappeared to 90% extent  in 5 days. i took it for 2 months.I suffer from no depression.I had no words to explain how good i felt.but once i stopped it all came back.I took again and the pain disappeared again.I plan to continue for some more time and slowly reduce 2 tabs/day to 1 and then 0 and watch.Read More Read Less
81: Only on it for a week, but like it so far, has evened out my wild mood swings. Had complete hysterecomy 2 years ago and Breast Cancer 6 years ago that was estrogen receptive. So far so good.
82: My dr put on this forgot flashes
83: was taking effexor for 7yrs then got switched to venlafaxine as this is the new generic for effexor but i find a big differance venlafaxine for me does not do well for me plus side effets like nervousnus much more pronounced for me i well tell my doctor to switch me back to the name brand effexor and pay the extra money
84: switched from effexor to the cheaper venlafaxine. No problem at all.
85: Been on this for 3 years to deal with anger it works!!!!
86: I have been taking a moderate dose - but some work stressors exasperated my depression and anxiety so my physician increased my dosage. I had been having an uncommon side effect all along - a rattling sound in my head (no jokes please!!!) - that occurred only if I missed a dose or took it later than usual. However, the increase in dosage gave me tinnitus (I did not see this listed as a side effect  - but I googled it and found research that confirmed this side effect) and increased the rattling. Given my new side effects to the higher dosage I am going to try a different medication. My side effects are uncommon - and I just wanted to share my experience. If this med works for you I am happy you have found relief. If your side effects outweigh the benefits discuss with your doctor to find the correct medication. There are many meds on the market and it seems since we are all biologically different we need to work with our doctors to find the right medication to work with our distinct body chemistry. Additionally, over the course of time a medication may not be as affective as it once was - discuss this with your doctor as well - since it may be time for a change. We all respond differently to different medication and we withdraw differently as well. I shared my experience because it is rare and if you are experiencing similar symptoms- please discuss with your doctor- you don’t have to suffer if the side effects are severe. The goal is to be well - and treat the illness with the proper dosage and the least amount of side effects. Stay well
87: SEVERE AND EVERLASTING SIDE EFFECTS
88: I started taking this med for menopausal symptoms; hot flashes, restless sleep, moodiness and irritability. It has been a life changer and I only wished I started taking this 10 years ago! I hope I don't have to stay on this or any medication indefinitely but for now I can live and when I'm ready to try life without it I will go off gradually.
89: Tried several other meds to no avail.
90: Concentrating and remembering are harder.
91: Tired, wanting to sleep all the time.  After about three weeks, feeling extremely anxious.
92: I'm so happy my Dr. prescribed this for me. It has really changed my life for the better. I've been on it for almost 1 month.My weight loss is awsome! Yes, they're side effects, but it's worth it!!!!
93: I have had major depression and anciexty for seven years.  My doctor changed me from Citalapram to Venlafaxine slow release within the last three months.  It has done wonders for my mood and energy levels.  I did miss about three doses one week and I felt the symtoms described for withdrawal but I am back on it regularly and I am very impressed how it has made my life much better overall.
94: I have just taken it for one day.
95: Night of the second day taking this, I'm drop-dead tired by 8pm. then was up and down all night with a 'knife in the skull' type of headache on the left side of my brain, and then hot and sweaty, and even mild hallucinations. morning of day three, and the headache is still off and on.
96: I've only been taking this for 2 days, and the side effects have been horrible so far. I can't say that the drug doesnt work because I havent been on it long enough. But so far I've had dizziness, nausea, shaking, dry mouth, blurred vision, worsening of my RLS, drowsiness, difficulty getting to sleep at night, lack of appitite, and weight loss. All of that in 2 days. But I'm going to push through it because I am desperate to get better. I'm quite positive these symptoms will pass, as the only symptoms I'm experiencing today are nausea, shaking, worstening RLS and tiredness
97: It has help with my depression and jumpyness but I fell like the rest of my emotions are muted. It takes alot for me to get happy, angry, or sad. It takes a a couple of days to feel the withdraw effects but I feel like the I have the flu when it hitts. Though as soon a I take another dose I am better. I slept alot when I was depressed and still do so I dont know if thats a side effect. I dont want to kill myself anymore so that is a plus.
98: I use effexor for both depression and anxiety. I have been scared all my life, both constant social fear and panic attacks. I was so bad that if I didn't have anything to worry over, I'd think of things that MIGHT happen to worry over. After taking this drug, I am FINALLY anxiety free and my depression is completely controlled. for someone with multiple sclerosis that's a miracle!! I love this drug and would tell anyone to try it.
99: Hate it, hate it, hate it.  It made me feel dead inside.  I am weaning off now (have gone from 300 mg. to 150 mg.) and will try Lexapro.  I had absolutely no libido and I started abusing alcohol.  Would not recommend this drug to anyone.
100: I have been taking this medication for about a year. I do notice, if I forget to take it 1 or 2 days. I become VERY sick. Nausea and vomiting really bad. I'm scared to go off of this medication. But, I hate being dependent on it.
101: I was prescribed this by my gynocologist for hot flashes!  After suffering for months with 20 to 25 hot flashes a day ~ after being on this medication for 2 weeks my hot flashes only come once in a while ~ usually when I'm upset!!  If I forget over the weekend I know it!!
102: This medication helped me with my PTSD, anxiety, and panic attacks. However, I gained about 30 lbs in 2 years.  For context, I do have a thyroid disorder that is under control and I do weights 3x/wk and run at least 2 miles 2x/wk, and I still gained weight. Now here is the horrible part.

I ask mu doctor to change Venlafaxine to Wellbutrin, because now my triglycerides and cholesterol are very borderline high. If want to stop using this medication, make arrangements to take a leave of absence or sick leave for a week or two. The withdrawal syndrome is extremely debilitating. My dr decrease my dose for 2wks to wean me off venlafaxine and it's been hell. The 1st 3 days after I took my last pill I felt fine, I experiences nausea, vertigo, and dizziness on days 4 and 5. On day 6... horrible a 2-hr panic attack that sent me to the ER. I have been taking 25mg of hidroxizine  every 8 hours and it has helped me control my panic attacks and my anxiety, but I am drowsy all day. DO NOT Quit this medication cold turkey. I recommend making arrangements with your dr for partial hospitalization to help you get through. It is that badRead More Read Less
103: taken at bedtime  i wakeup tired  taken after 10 plus hrs of slep  seems to take all day to work   take  150 mg day
104: Yhis drug has made me have nausea,drowiness,and has made me very weak.
105: I started taking this medicine for chronic migraines. I was put on 75 mg to start, took it for only 4 days. At first it made me really energized, then after day 1 I was extremely tired and lethargic. Day 4 it gave me severe chest pains and numbness in my arms. Never felt anything like that before. This medicine scared me to death.
106: Venlafaxine has been a literal lifesaver for me. I love it. It has allowed me a quality of life I never thought I could have. I went from being suicidal and having multiple panic attacks a day to completely functional — I feel "normal".

The first week or so of taking it were rough: I had a pretty bad tremor. That passed, though, and I have no other side effects except a very low alcohol tolerance.

My only issue is that I have to take my 225mg dose exactly on time — even 20 min late results in feeling dizzy and I get a headache. For me this is a minor inconvenience, though, and well worth it.Read More Read Less
107: Venlafaxine ( Effexor ) is a horrible drug.  I would not recommend it to anyone.  The side effects are wicked. It works for some people, but for me it was a total waste of money.
108: My Dr. started me out at 50mg a day until I reached 300mg a day, I did not feel or see any changes until I reached 300mg. I am worried it won’t last but happy for the moment. I suffer from combat PTSD, anxiety disorder, and major depression. I only want to be able to function normally and this is working now.
109: I got serotonin syndrome after taking one pill! I have also been on vyvanse for 4 years, so maybe there is an interaction there. I tried this after 3 different SSRIs didn't work. I woke up incredibly anxious, sweating, had chills and then hot flashes, and then threw up and couldn't eat or drink for hours. I got so dehydrated I had 2 IVs of saline put it me. So yeah, it is possible to get serotonin syndrome after taking one pill. I stopped throwing up after the effexor wore off and I got some zofran at the hospital
110: i just started on this med . so far so good .i seem to express myself more than usual .don't know  if this is a good thing . i have to be careful  sometimes so i don't say the wrong thing .but I feel good about speaking my mind
111: I was prescribed venlafaxine years ago for general anxiety disorder and it was life changing in such a positive way. Years later I wanted to try and get pregnant and I wanted to try weaning off meds while being closely monitored by my doctor. I personally chose to not be on meds while pregnant. As recommended by my doctor I weaned myself slowly by opening up capsules and disposing a small amount of the medicine at a time very gradually. I has zero side effects! A year after my baby was born I needed to go back on medication. I had a different doctor and they prescribed me Paxil as they said it was well received by their patients. Paxil made me extremely tired no matter how much sleep I got. I then tried Cipralex which became ineffective aflyer a few months and then Trintillex which became ineffective as well. I’ve been back on venlafaxine for a few months and I feel so so much relief! I think people need to keep in mind that these medications aren’t a one size fits all, everyone reacts so differently. I’ve read some terrible reviews about this drug, yet I’ve had nothing but positive experiences. I think a lot of these medications are trial and error, you just need to work closely with your doctor and know there is a right medication out there for you - it just might take time and a few different brands before you find the right one:Read More Read Less
112: I only took half a tablet as prescribed and within 2 hours felt like I was going to throw up and was soaking wet sweating.  I was in bed for almost 24 hours feeling horrible.
113: I have been taking it for about 1 yr for fibromyalgia, I feel a lot better, the aches and pains are gone, I do have some issues w/sleeping & sweating but feel it is worth it for the improvement in my mood & pain.
114: I've used both the XR and the generic regular release. The XR made me less sleepy and was easier to take (one each evening with a little snack). I went on the generic because of the cost. It's helped me greatly with panic disorder and depression. I've been able to deal with stress and residual depressive symptoms with exercise, relationships and eating better. I get a little more nauseous with the generic, too, but I just have to eat something when I take my meds to make that manageable. I would go back to the XR in a minute if I could afford it, but at least I can live my life with minimal side effects and no panic attacks
115: I agree with those who find distinct differences between effexor xr and venlafaxin reg release.  I was diagnosed in 1995 and have tried many different meds.  To me they all have side effects. Is it worth tolerating for the overall benefit?  I have experienced most of the stated side effects, but will tolerate them until I can afford the effexor xr again.  My depression is much worst than even the brain zap side effects.  My main frustration is the insurance company's manipulation of our health care.  They should want to help us get better--not pricing us into cheap ineffective care!  I recommend effexor, it really helps me.Read More Read Less
116: Was taking Cymbalta and had gastric bypass, couldn't take capsules and Cymbalta couldn't be opened so Dr. switched me over to this and I do not feel it works anywhere near as good as Cymbalta.
117: While the medication has worked well, I am experiencing severe withdrawal symptoms and have felt worse trying to come off of it...terrible side effects trying to come off.
118: Bad result overall!  After using the brand name Effexor XR capsules for 5 years without any problems and with good results in terms of alleviating depression, my pharmacy decided to switch me to this oblong orange capsule generic (even though it was the same price as brand name).  After using this generic for 3 weeks, I noticed that it was not working well in controlling depression and I heard/felt that "whooshing/brain zap" in my brain that others have described. Worst of all, I experienced a horrible serontin syndrome the 4th week, so I immediately called my dr. and he switched me back to the brand name, red Effexor XR capsules. My neurologist and my friend who works at a pharmaceutical company told me to beware of generics, because they are NOT the same as the brand name; their manufacturers are not held to the same stringent regulations in order to produce their drugs, the manufacturers are not required to use the full percentage of active ingredients, formulations and potency can vary, etc. You truly get what you pay for!Read More Read Less
119: As a child/teenager I was always depressed. I felt panicked at school like I was going to do/say something wrong & get in trouble.  At 38,although I had made it to a supervising position, I still doubted everything I did. I overworked because I never thought I was doing good enough until I finally became so exhausted and lost contact with reality. Hospitalized for 3 weeks I was tried on several things with different side effects.  Now I have been on Effexor for 13 yrs (as Venlafaxine for the last year).  1 yr my dr chgd me to XR but realized it cost lots more then regular release so I switched back.  Generic seems no different to me.  I get nauseous only if I don't eat within 15 min of taking a dose.  Memory & concentration are better since I don't worry all the time except when I am having my period, then both are flighty.  I have noticed repeatedly that if I take Ibuprofen instead of Tylenol, it seems to block my anti-depressant. Several days of Ibuprofen would cause the return of depression, sadness & anxiety. I stick with Tylenol & I am fine.  The first years I took 3x37.5mg a day, about 4 yrs ago I moved down to 2x37.5mg and then only 1x37.5mg a day.  Mainly because of $. For me, I found 1x3.75 good for 3 wks a mth but needed 2x37.5 during my period week. Or if something extra stressfull happened like a death, a car accident, or moving.  Taking this drug gave me relief from my depression so I could work through my problems. The drug can't fix me all by itself but I couldn't move on into improving myself without its help.  I am very gratefull for the greater enjoyment I can feel in life now.   Read More Read Less
120: This medication reacts with 8 of my other meds I take. 2 of them severe. I suggest everyone check about drun interactions with any med. Web MD has a great site to enter all your meds & see the intereactions.
121: Works well for anxiety. Some weight gain. Only major downfall is if I miss a dose accidentally I get very tired, nauseous and get a terrible headache. It's horrible.
122: I have been on antidepressants for 30 years, none of them have made me feel NORMAL, except Effexor Er 75 MG. Capsules. I was put on these in 2008, my Doctor recommended these for my Breast Cancer. She said she puts all of her patients on it to help get through it. I recommend it highly, except, if you miss any, or go without for 3-5 days it is horrible. The head zaps, confusion, crying spells, anything you can think of happens. God forbid if I can't get my meds, it won't be good. I guess I could taper off of them but I'm afraid too. They have helped me in so many ways it's like I can't live without them. I've thought about it so many times, just tapering off but like I said, the side effects are not good. Good luck.Read More Read Less
123: I had been on Lexapro previously which helped somewhat. Venlafaxine got me over the depression
and anxiety. Was a game changer for me. May need to go to a lower dose, am having trouble falling
asleep. Otherwise, very satisfied.
124: switched from effexor xr to this, only to have VERY VERY bad skin legions and rashes forming after switching, so bad i still have scars from it on my arms and hands, switched back and they subsided. this drug is NOT ready for use by anyone! another woman i worked with used this med and ended up in the hospital due to the med causing heart palpitations, she is in the process of suing the drug company for it. STAY AWAY!
125: My eyes have been more sensitive to the light since I started taking this medication, and I sweat excessively.  But it does work to relieve my anxiety & I am very pleased.
126: Been on this medication twice. The first time about 12 years ago for 2+ years and currently on it for 2 years. The side effects/withdrawal symptoms are the worst things I've ever experienced. I can miss a dose by about 24hrs and have migraine headaches, dizziness, nausea, and irritability, and sometimes I feel like my brain is shaking.  As long as I take the medication as directed and on time the only bothersome side effects I have are increased sweating/hot flashes and random muscle twitch mostly occurring at bed time. Overall, I love how this medication works for my depression and anxiety issues. That completely out weighs the side effects of a missed dose. Just have to be extra cautious to fill RX on time and not forget a doseRead More Read Less
127: I have been taking Effexor XR for the past 3 years for anxiety. I have been very satisfied. I do have the brain zaps if I forget to take it a whole day which is wierd but is not too bad if that is the worst side effect I will ever have. My pharmacist switched me to the generic Venlafaxine ER today. So far I haven't noticed any difference.I will post again after I have been on it for several weeks or if I notice any differences. I take 1 75MG capsule daily.
128: I have only been on this med for a week at 75mg 2x a day. I still tired all the time and can sleep all nite and most of the day. I have no energy. i have been on different meds for depression for 10 yrs and still trying to find the right combo for me. The last 3 yrs was on citlopram and wellbutrin and gain 40 lbs ( i am only 5ft 1in) I just want to able to function and have the engery to get everything i need to get done done daily!!
129: I took venlafaxine for several years and after not feeling any better my doctor decided to change my medication to a different drug.  I did not hear the doctor correctly and when I began to decrease my venlafaxine I did not do it correctly and had severe depression and I was on the brink of a break down.  I was unproductive and severely depressed for several days and it took several weeks to become stable.  I was scared and very ill.  If you are needing help with your depression please know that the withdrawl procedure is very important and very difficult.  I also had decreased sex drive, weight gain and it really didn't do the trick for me overall.  Wellbutrin is far easier and more effective for me.Read More Read Less
130: Made it hard to Breathe!
131: Stopped taking Sertraline due to chronic diarrhea and started taking Venlafaxine. This med has been the worst of all the others I've been on. Drowsiness, sweating, leg shakes, dizziness, no sex drive, shortness of breath, nothing good so far. Sertraline was the best except for the diarrhea. I felt great and even had a sex drive. I hope to get off this med soon.
132: For the last 6 years I have been taking this at 150 mg. My panic attacks are nonexistent. Taking this helped me to also seek out a therapist and combined with my medication I feel like I am finally normal. To anyone reading this I hope you find what works for you and do not give up. I wish you all the best.
133: this drug made me go from being very depressed to very hostile in qa short period of time. i also was given it to treat hot flashes and that din't work to well either. i am totally dissatisfied with the performance of the drug.
134: Started Effexor almost 2 years ago after being on Paxil for 2 years.  Effexor has helped ease my hot flashes and allows me to experience all of my emotions so I feel more like the real "me".
135: I'm in my mid 40s and have been on a few different meds.  I currently take Buproprion (Wellbrutrin) and Venlafaxine (prescribed because of low cost).  This med. makes me extrememly sleepy.  I can only take it on Friday afternoons and usually sleep late Saturday morning.  During Saturdays, I nap if I don't go outside to work or am up moving around.  I can't sit and do any work (search the web, read, play a board game with the kids)or I'll fall asleep.  I'm back to normal by Sunday.  The depression is under control so I tolerate the sleepiness.  I'm considering cutting the pill since I'm already on a low dose.  I am always hoping that I don't go through an extremely stressful time because I can't take the Ven. more than once a week!Read More Read Less
136: Efexor-XR was prescribed for depression. After less than 3wks I stopped taking it.  I was on 75mg PM. The depression was worse. I had mood swings, was irrational, and got extremely aggressive and violent without any warnings. Was smashing things, and hitting people. Had horrible night sweats and always had a dry mouth. Major weight gain immediately.
137: only been taking it for three days!
138: I love how this drug makes me feel, but, I do not lik the fact that it makes me gain so much weight.
139: I have been taking Effexor for a couple of years with very good results. My refil this replaced my effexor.  After a week or 10 days I noticed irritability, depression, which has worsened with use. I spoke with my pharmacist re this reaction and she has heard of no other reactions like mine with the use of this generic. She said some people just don;t feel that a generic works as well.  I am not one of those people, believe me.  I would much rather pay a $3.00 co-pay than a $30.00 one. She said that my BCBS may not be willing to pay for me to get Effexor now that a proven generic is out. I have to call my Dr. tomorrow as I do not feel that I can continue to take this med. It took several months to get me regulated with an anti depressant.  The first 2 I tried either didn't help or stopped working after 6 months of so. I am very upset at the thought of having to go thru all of that again.Read More Read Less
140: This medication has been a life saver for me. I have been on several medications before this, and none have been as helpful as Effexor. (I also take Wellbutrin.) I've been diagnosed with Borderline Personality Disorder, Manic/ Depressive, General Anxiety, Social Anxiety, Seasonal Anxiety, Major Depressive Disorder, PTSD and I show signs of Schizophrenia. Effexor does have many negative side effects. The side effects that I suffer from are nausea, loss of balance, sweating, dry mouth, no sex drive, constipation, tremors and excessively yawning (in the beginning but no longer). If I accidentally miss a dose, the withdrawals are intense. Mania, tremors, headaches, extreme sweating. But it clearly states in the medication description that this will happen if you miss a dose, and it directs you to NOT quit this medication suddenly. If you complain about the side effects of quitting cold turkey, that's your own fault. You were clearly instructed not to do so. While the negative side effects can be harsh, the positives are worth it. I can keep my intrusive thoughts to a minimum, my mind doesn't race a mile a minute, my impulsive behaviors are very minimal and controllable. I have control over my outbursts of anger and I no longer lay in bed all day. I now have the motivation to cook a meal, actually partake in activities with my children, to clean my house and visit with friends and family. I don't have sudden suicidal urges, I can think rationally. I go to work everyday instead of hiding in my home and going ghost on everyone for weeks at a time. I am generally happy. Do I have my moments? Yes, absolutely. But they are far and few between and can be easily identified and diffused. My marriage and my family life have been positively impacted. My overall quality of life has greatly improved.  I can go through some uncomfortable side effects if it means I have a higher quality of life.  Best of luck to anyone suffering.  Read More Read Less
141: I have been on this medication, it is the immediate release form, now for about 5 months, I have experienced the profuse sweating, feeling drowsy, but can't fall asleep, latest that I have been up is 6 am.  have had the brain zaps, I was trying to lie down on the couch and relax and I slowly started to feel this sensation in my head, then it worsened, I was not able to wake from them, which scared me, I could hear my husband in the room, but could not get his attention. I also have very high anxiety, I am on a med to sleep and one to help me relax.  Alcohol is a definite NO NO I had a celebratory toast at a wedding and a migraine hit me in 20 min. I have no appetite to speak of but can feel that my body needs fuel, sometimes eating a high fiber cereal will do me for the majority of the day.Read More Read Less
142: I've only been on this medication (37.5mg) for a week and my family can tell a GREAT improvement.  I no longer fly off the handle.  I have energy and have even lost 5 lbs. Can't beat that. I take it in the morning, tried the afternoon but had problems getting to sleep come night time.
143: Didn't sleep for the first 5 days of taking this drug, then crashed for 2 straight days. Heart pounding out of my chest, sick to my stomach, did not help depression and had all the bad side affects named. Thought I was going to die, really! Weened myself off, bad reaction to that, migraine, always tired, sleepy, just not good for me. Started with 150mg a day. Not good. Haven't had a chance to talk to Dr. yet, but I don't ever want to live like that again, even though it was short, I know better.Read More Read Less
144: had depression/anxiety and occasionally panic eposodes since age 12. i lived a live of pain until i visited the doctor at age 47. i wish i had gone lots earlier but was too afraid to go. about 30 seconds into explaining my symptons to the doc he said i have depression. i about fell off the table. i could not believe and i didn't want to believe him. i thought his diagnosis was completly wrong. he put me on Effexor initially and a few years later i was prescriber the generic Venalfaxine as my insurance wouldn't pay for Effexor. i found no difference in medicines. he was right. PRO's: i'm calm, no more anxiety and panic attaches. i can go out to the malls, big cities, large building without feeling anxious.i can be myself like everyone else. the drug has given my LIFE back. I LUV this drug. I'll be taking it the rest of my life, but thats OK with me. CON's: Blurred Vision and low sexual desires. These are the two main and worse symptoms that i don't like. but it looks like all the depession meds have these symptoms too. you can't miss or don't try to skip a dose. you'll get brain zaps that i can't stand. and don't try to wain yourself off unless your doctor knows and can assist you. try it you'll love it
145: I have been using this medication for approx. 16 yrs.  It has saved my life.  I have severe depression and anxiety.  Have tried multiple medications. Have gotten worse, gotten better.  Have always come back to this.
146: Severe dry mouth, difficulty sleeping and tiredness. Did not improve night sweats.
147: I've taken this for well over a year and in combination with Wellbutrin have had very good results controlling my depression and the irritibility that went with it.
148: This med saved my life. I could not have gone on without it. 75 mg p/day. no real side effects.
149: Well for starters, this pill did absolutely nothing positive for me. Now to be fair there was only one negative side affect that I know of (nausea) and no withdrawal symptoms, but it still did nothing. Now whether this is because the medication doesn't work or I was misdiagnosed (I was) I'm not 100% sure, but this medication is not worth it (at least for treating, to quote my psych, "anxious thoughts and paranoia") One upside though is that the pills I got sound like maracas when I shake them. Horrible going down the throat though.Read More Read Less
150: dont like the sexual side effects, reaching orgasm is the worst and it never ever gets better i have been of effexor xr atleast 8 years and not difference in sexual side effects..
151: Iam delighted to say it works for me but one of side effect makes me wonder if it is worth it sometime. I experience extreme nausa. Even when I take it as I go to sleep I sometime wake up wanting to vomit. I would love to find something that works well for the depression and not the nausia. I do not remember having this with the name brand Effexor but unfortunately our insurance will not cove the name brand
152: Four years ago I injured my hamstring and pretty much every near-by body part on my left middle quadrant (hip, ALL my glute muscles, IT band, hamstring, etc) and fell into what my Doctor referred to as "pain induced depression".  He explained that if I were not in pain, I would not be depressed.    My injury caused permanent nerve and muscle damage, so I had to make drastic life-style changes that I was not use to.  (I went from overly active, to just getting by.)    I tried Cymbalta and after just one pill, it was a no-go for me (bad reactions.)  I was hesitant to try another brand, but thought I had nothing to loose.    My Doc put me on the lowest possible does of Venlafaxine (25mg 3xday) and after just 1 week, I started to notice a difference.  He wanted to increase me after 3 months, but I have never asked for it, as the minimal dose is just enough to get me wanting to live life again.  It also helped reduce my pain just enough that I have not had to go from my regular Tramadol to the dreaded Percocet.    I know this is not for everyone, but if you have nerve pain AND are depressed, this just may work for you.    NEVER GIVE UP, sometimes you have to be your own advocate.  (I saw 15 docs, had 9 MRIs, 7 various injections, 2CTs, 2 surgeries, 1 ultra sound, 1 PRP injection all in 4 years before I found something that works for me.Read More Read Less
153: still very depressed
154: My ENT  prescribed this to me for vertigo that I have now had for 7 months which is slowly getting better. I just finished reading all the side effects of this medicine. You have got to be kidding me. Thanks anyway.
155: I am in a Chronic Pain Management program wherein the docs are dealing specifically with pain, depression, etc.    Whether it was psychosomatic or not, I felt relief immediately on taking the first 25 mg tab.    Then, also with rapid onset, it began to give me hot flashes (which I left behind several years ago). I realize that Venlafaxine is sometimes prescribed to relieve hot flashes, but it had the opposite effect on me.    Scrip said to increase dose by 25 mg every 5 days to max of 50 mg in AM and 50 mg in PM.    I decided to stick with the extremely low 25 mg dose once/day for just over two weeks, and then increase by a half tab.    I felt myself slip back into depression, and of course, the hot flashes remained.    I called the doctor to report on this, and he prescribed Trazodone instead.    I was on Venlafaxine for about one month.    We'll see how Trazodone works...Read More Read Less
156: Withdrawal is horrible but I also think while taking it it’s making me gain weight and have compulsive eating anyone else ?
157: I've been on this a week. I know it takes a month to get used to but I want to put out there how it's affected me. The first day I was real dizzy and my hands were shaky. The second day not dizzy as much but random yawning. These last few days I'm okay I find everything funny periodically. You really have to get a good amount of sleep on them or the side affects really tend to show.
158: I started this medication with 1 pill a.m. and p.m. as I was not doing as well after a bout with pneumonias as I felt I should be I notified my Dr. and he then put me on three a day. this only the second day. I still feel a little tired and hope this will soon pass
159: I took one dose before bed last night and woke two hours later feeling nauseous and unable to fall back to sleep. I see others have similar reactions. I guess this is not the treatment I need.
160: I can not tell any difference.
161: It has taken me a very long time to realize that my night sweats, hyperhidrosis, agitation, constant yawning and other problems are all due to the Effexor XR/Venlafaxine. I have complained to my doctors about these things and all I get is a blood work up and then nothing. My tests always come out fine, but not one single doctor has made the connection between this drug and those severe side effects. My psychiatrist didn't even know what "brain zaps" were. I am becoming very discrouraged with the medical community and the lack of proper help. I recently switched to the generic because of my insurance change and the side effects are the same. I get these side effects constantly, but especially if I am a little late on my dosage. I cannot stand that fact that I am a prisoner to this drug and I may never get off of it. It made a difference 13 years ago when I was a teenager, with my depression and anxiety, but had I known then all that I know now, I would never have gotten on this drug. I have read that people like me who eventually wean down to 25mg or so have the "discontinuation syndrome" for years, that's if it ever goes away. And please be aware- their new drug "Pristiq" is the same thing!! It is call DEvenlafaxine, and has the same side effects....I want to get this out there so other don't go through this hell!!!Read More Read Less
162: I WAS ON EFFEXOR XR CHANGED TO THIS ONE DUE TO THE COST,,,HAVE NOT BEEN HAPPY AT ALL WAY TOO MANY SIDE EFFECTS. I WAS TAKING 100MG OF EFFEXOR AND THEN WENT TO 100MG TWICE A DAY, EXPERIENCES CONSTIPATION, HEADACHES, VERY DRY MOUTH, IRRIBILITY WITH MY HUSBAND, STOMACH PROBLEMS. ETC ETC,,,GOING TO MY DOCTORS ON FRIDAY TO SEE IF THERE IS ANY OTHER MEDICATION I CAN TAKE,,,HAVE TO TAKE SOMETHING DUE TO STRESS LEVEL OF JOB.
163: THIS MED S WONDERFUL FOR ANXIETY. IM STILL N IT BUT IM SCARED TO STOP TAKING IT CASUE ITS DONE MIRACLES FOR ME.
164: My Dr. put me on 75 mg 1 a day take in the AM.  I took my first pill yesterday and it was HORRIBLE!!  Nausea, Vomiting dizziness extremely tired beyond all day could not go to sleep I finally went to sleep this morning from 10 AM to 11am only for one hour!! Racing thoughts... he told me to give it 3 days unless to see how it fits me... but I have to take care of my 3 kids and this medicine is not good for me AT ALL!!!!
165: I've been on this RX for about 2 years.  I do experience sweating more than I would like but I can live with it.  Overall it has helped stabilize my mood.  What I am experiencing more recently which is concerning and I'm trying to figure out if it's related to this RX is complete loss of bladder control.  I'm 38 and literally cannot hold my urge to urinate longer than a minute or two.  Has anyone had this same experience?  Over the last 6 months it went from moderate to severe.  I have a follow up to discuss but curious what others know.     Read More Read Less
166: I took Effexor XR for 5 years with no problem except for the cost. I had my dr switch me to this generic since I wouldn't have a co-pay on it. Well, I've been taking it for about 4 months and I am so nauseated every single day and dizzy and generally feel like something is bad wrong with me physically even tho my doctor says I'm fine. I know it's this medication because if I go a day without it, I'm not sick. But of course I can't keep that up! I take 200mg a day so stopping now is not an option. I am switching back to the Brand name capsules regardless of the cost. The generic pills are so bitter, it's like swallowing gall and I think that has something to do with the horrible nausea. I'm glad I looked at web md and these comments because I thought I was the only one having the problem. Thank God for webmd!Read More Read Less
167: I have been taking venlafaxine hcl 75 mg for 1 year now. This is the 4th pill I have tried to eliminate my anxiety. I will say as far as my anxiety goes this pill has been very effective at removing my anxiety but it has made me less effective as a person. One of the first things I noticed when starting it was the constant hot flashes and sweating. After 4 months I noticed my thoughts were foggy but as long as I really focused I could get by at work. I also had my blood pressure increas so much I had to star taking pills for that as well. I also have frequent migraines, weight gain and tiredness. As I said it has been 1 year now and my mind has gotten so foggy and I have become so irritable that I am going to request my doc take me off it and we try something else before I lose my job or my family.Read More Read Less
168: This medicine has made me very tired all the time. Like I can't ever get enough sleep. I have no energy to do the things I enjoy.
169: Been on this for about a year.  37.5mg worked great for a while, then hot flashes came back, so we upped the dose to 75mg and I haven't had a hot flash since.  No side effects, except the "anti-depressant" keeps me calm, nothing upsets me and that helps keep my blood pressure in check.  Love this stuff.
170: foggy headed, sleepy after 16 hours of taking the drug. slow to speak, not focused!
171: Have taken Effexor XR for over 7 years now and had to switch to venlafaxine per drug coverage. Also comes in 225mg which drug coverage paid. Seems about the same.
172: While this drug is effective. It causes weight gain. It's also very physically addicting and you will go through absolute hell trying to detox from it. More than any other drug I've been on.
173: i have been on this drug for 3 wks and i have not noticed any benefits or side affects/nothing ventured nothing gained i guess
174: Reduced hot flash episodes while taking Tomoxifin
175: I have been on this medication for a little more than 5 years for what began as severe clinical depression and severe generalized anxiety with panic attacks.  I took a dose of 150mg/day for the first couple years.  It took a long time to adjust to the drug, but it did manage to get me out of the suicidal state of mind.  After about 3 years, my doctor reduced me to 112.5mg/day, and that didn't go well.  My symptoms became bipolar-like, and it took over a year to adjust to the dosage and get back to normal.  I will not be reducing again in the near future.Read More Read Less
176: Switch to this after being on a SSRI, have been on it for 6 mths. Has not helped, no increase in energy, the increase in sweating and the ringing of ears is very annoying but could put up with it if the Med worked,which it doesn't for me.Did increase dose and still was tired with no energy-was too tired to be depressed or anxious.No change in sex drive ,increase in weight and the terrible hot flashes/sweating.Am weaning off from it slowly now.
177: I've been taking this drug for about 2 wks. And I have to say I'm a different person. It's great. There were side effects at first like trouble sleeping and unusual tiredness but those symptons passed.
178: WHAT EVER YOU DO DON'T TAKE THIS DRUG, unless you plan on being addicted to it for the rest of your life!  I allowed my doctor to put me on this because it was easier to believe he knew what he was doing, not realizing what would happen in the long run.  1. There is a difference in the generic and the original...don't be fooled into thinking otherwise. 2.  You will become addicted to this drug as they will keep upping your dosage until it is hell with withdrawals that are incredibly hard to go through if you have anything else wrong with you.  3.  This drug effects more than just your mood...you lose your drive to do most anything over time.  Forget your sexual drive, you will become almost zombie as far as your emotions are concerned or you will experience worsening of your symptoms.  4.  Oh yes it can "help" you, but in the long run it hurts you more  This drug is just an almost automatic for some healthcare systems (do they get a "kickback" for using this drug to treat their patients?).    My doctor is trying to switch this one to another dangerous drug so I am going off this drug slowly and this is my second week in hell.  Nausea, dizzy, dis-orientation, sleeplessness and memory lapses not to mention finally I am starting to mourn my husband's death.      This drug simply makes you complacent so your doctor doesn't have to think about you and your healthcare provider certainly never did!    DON'T GET HOOKED ON THIS DRUG!  DON'T ALLOW YOUR DOCTOR TO GET YOU HOOKED TO A DRUG SIMPLY FOR HIS CONVENIENCE AND OBAMACARE'S COMPLACENCY TO BIG GOVERNMENT PHARMACEUTICAL!  If you value loving and caring about your life and the others in it, than never allow your doctor to become your "pusher"!Read More Read Less
179: I have generalised anxiety disorder and low mood. Venlafaxine is the only antidepressant that has helped (sertraline, fluoxetine and Citalopram did not help me). 
I have been taking this for 8 months now and it significantly reduced my anxiety and low mood - biggest difference for me was a reduction in constant anxious thoughts, this really helped my sex life (despite sexual dysfunction sometimes being a side effect) because my libido increased a lot and I was able to be present during sex, not anxious and distracted. At 8 months my anxiety symptoms have crept back up again (though not as high as before the medication) and so I am increasing my dosage (150mg) by 37.5mg every couple of weeks for a little while. This is the only reason I've rated satisfaction a 4/5 but I think it is fine to be honest that I have to increase dosage a bit now, I don't mind too much because overall it has been a helpful medication.Read More Read Less
180: My GYN wouldn't prescribe Estradiol after age 70. I rarely had hot flashes when on Estradiol and my mood swings were pretty much under control. Since I couldnt take my Estradiol anymore, my PCP prescribed venlafaxine because other patients had success with it. After about 2.5 months, I started to have bad hot flashes, but the worst was the mood swings and depression. I thought maybe the lowest dose should be increased, so PCP told me to double. Awful decision. I had to stop after about 5 days. I was extremely anxious, very depressed, crying, mood swings all over the place (not a nice a person to be around). I was annoyed with EVERYONE, I couldn't fall asleep at night, and was tired all the time and had to takes naps in the daytime. Just a really bad experience for me; not a good choice of medications. I can't even stand myself. Dr prescribed a new med that I hope will help me feel normal again. I'd rather take my chances of getting of cancer (the reason I had to come off Estradiol) than live the rest of my life as this horrible person I have become.Read More Read Less
181: I have been on lots of antidepressants since losing my son in a car wreck.  After a couple of years on each antidepressant, they seem to stop working or work less effectively, however, Venlafaxine has been a life saver, it has helped me enormously.
182: This has been the best antidepressant that I have taken, after years of Prozac, which made me feel too hyper. No side effects, just lowered dosage last week, and I still feel steady and can concentrate.Afraid to stop taking it,as I had many suicidal thoughts before.My doctor said at least a year longer before even thinking about stopping treatment with this drug..it did save my life!
183: I still get hot flashes. It does not help with my nervous, shaky and can not sleep.my doctor wants me to see a shrink because I want to get off the medicine! I had a seizure taking this medicine. I wish someone can help me out here!
184: this drug should be taken off the market. i only took 1 pill of 37.5 mg and experienced a trip to the ER w/ High Blood Pressure, Elevate Heart Rate, Chills, Tremors, lightheaded, dizziness, not able to think clearly, and sensory shock sensations all over my body. This drug is NOT good at all and should be recalled.
185: I have been taking this drug along with two others for about 4yrs now. It for the most part has helped me deal with my depression and anxiety.
186: extremely difficult withdrawal effects, even with tapering doses for 3 weeks as per my doctors instructions. I’ve been on anti depressants for 9years now, Effexor for over 3 after switching from pristiq due to the difference in cost. The switch was fine, but I finally decided recently that I wanted to go off my antidepressants, as I was tired of the side effects that come with it (little to no energy, shakiness, low libido, and the brain zaps when late to take a dose even by an hour). I can’t remember the last time I have been in such pain mentally, I haven’t been able to go in to work for half the week, I can’t eat, sleep, or even function like a regular human being. Everything feels terrifying. I feel nothing like myself. For reference, I was on a 150mg dose everyday, and started to taper down to x3 37mg pills the first week, then x2 the second, x1 the third, and now nothing on my fourth. If you are thinking of discontinuing these, please please talk to your doctor and have them explain the potential withdrawal effects, and the importance of having a support system. If I didn’t have someone that could stay with me during the day, I don’t know if I would still be here. I’m just hoping this eventually ends bc I don’t even remember what it’s like to feel like myself anymore
187: My doctor started me on the generic Venlafaxine XR less than 2 weeks ago, for depression with anxiety, at the 'starter' dose of 37.5 mg/day. Other than dry throat and some loss of appetite, no side effects for me. Within 5 days I was feeling better—no longer waking up early in the morning with my heart beating out of my chest and terrified, as I have been on and off for years. I feel calmer and don't worry as much. I would like to stay at this low dosage as the results have been great and I don't like taking medications for anything anyway. I still haven't regained my full appetite, which sucks, as I am a real 'foodie', but the tradeoff is worth it. I see many comments on here regarding the expense of Effexor vs. the generic. Just to let you know that in my province in Canada, with an employers medical program, 2 weeks of Venlafaxine cost me less than $4.Read More Read Less
188: I have continuous headaches.    I was taking Effexoruntil two months ago.
189: Daily headaches and nausea.
190: 8 year on venlafaxine fine in the beginning but in the recent 3 years i have been suffering ill-effects.  Pain when trying to do general chores like walking up stairs etc.  Doctors have diagnosised me with fibromyalgia i am concern it may be the venlafaxine as muscle and joint pain are listed as a side effect.  Am i alone? please let me know
191: I was on 80 mg of prozac so my doctor switched me to 75 mg of venlafaxine er for 7 days then upped it to 150 mg. I'm having less crying episodes. I have more motivation but i have severe insomnia. I haven't slept in 3 nights.
192: the DR.switched me from effexor extended release to generic because of expense.Generic does not come in 150 mg so he set it up so Icould take 2 75mg tabs twice a day. I don't notice the loss of extended release.This med along with buspirone allows me to keep a balance between depression and angst. They allow the calm middle ground for me. I am glad for that.HM>
193: I am guessing my weight gain is from this medicine. I have taken Effexor XR for years and have not had any problem with weight but since my insurance won't cover Effexor I now have to take this medication and I have gained 7-10 pounds and I am on a strict diet plus take topamax. I can not drop the extra weight gain! They just moved my dosage up to 150 mg. think I will go back to my 75 mg. to see if that makes a difference.
194: This was prescribed for anxiety and depression.  It worked fairly well but I was tired all the time and gained a little weight.  The weight gain could have been due to the gabapentin that I was on at the same time.  When I went off the gabapentin and stayed on this med I did start loosing weight.  I just wasn't happy with this med because I was "dulled" and did feel happy.  I wasn't anxious but then again I did seem to enjoy things either.  So now I am trying a new med.  Hoping it works better.  Also feel I have a new dr that is listening better than the one that prescribed this one.  Read More Read Less
195: I had taken this medication in the past, and just recently started taking it again. Started out with 37.5 MG and I am now taking 75 MG a day. The only real side effect I am experiencing is sweating. My palms and my arm pits are constanly wet.
196: VERY IMPORTANT NOTE: My insurance kinda sucks (Aetna), everyone's more or less does unless you have USAA,  so of course like many others I'm on the generic. DO NOT TAKE THE 225mg SINGLE-PILL GENERIC. IT SUCKS. The time-release mechanism is wonky. Take 150mg+75mg generics, THE CAPSULES!!! I can't stress this enough!    Anyway,    Used to take 150mg, it worked, but not well enough. After a psychiatric hospital visit I upped my dose to 225mg and it's working wonders. I suffer from Major Depressive Disorder, Generalized Anxiety Disorder (w/ mild OCD), and ADHD. It has done wonders for the first two, I can actually go out and be a normal human without anxiety attacks. I no longer fear being in public places or doing things that were hellish for my anxiety before like the simple act of making phone calls. I'm no longer actively suicidal and I can't be grateful enough. I do experience the side effects mentioned of excessive/weird sweating but I'm used to it because when I took Wellbutrin it was the same if not worse and I'm a little chubby anyway. The yawning is a little weird but nothing too major. I do have unusually high earwax build-up but I think it's more blood pressure related. Sex drive is fine though, it didn't obliterate it like Zoloft did, which didn't work for me anyway. I can't comment on the supposedly hellish withdrawal symptoms since I'm not withdrawing from it anytime soon but do always refill your prescription before you run out and don't skip doses!! No bueno when you skip a dose!    Good luck to everyone!Read More Read Less
197: Too many bad reactions and not enough benefits. Have taken it 4 months and am haing a lot of trouble getting off of it! Can't be to good for you with all the bad side effects!!!!
198: I have been taking effexor for 3 years and have had no problems. After suffering for years attacks of extreme anxiety, disassociation and eating disorder, I feel I have my life back. I do have a problem with greatly increased sweating but other than that no problems
199: i have been unable to stay awake for more than 5 hours at a time and have been unable to stay asleep for more than 4 hours at a time
i am able to cry but that’s just because i’m off my old antidepressant 
i feel the exact same off my meds as on my meds except for the withdrawal symptoms which feels like the worst high i’ve ever experienced
200: I took one pill and experienced hallucinations and trouble breathing. I woke up exhausted with fixed pupils, throughout the day I had chest pain, heart palpitations, nausea and high blood pressure. The following day I am having severe migraine in right side of scull and vision issues.
201: I have taken this med for about 5 yrs.  After my second trial of discontinuing this med, I am experiencing confusion & forgetfullness. I felt better on this medication   Is the confusion & forgetfullness part of the withdrawal??  I am a 69 year old female.  My dr. was not open to this second trial but consented to 1 90 day refill.  I don't like what's happening.  Please advise
202: Convenient dosage - one a day.  Slight side effects, tolerable.  Trial has been 6 months and counting, better than the Citalopram use before.
203: I am taking this medication for hot flashes and while that has gotten better the side effects are not worth it. I have had to deal with constipation, nausea, and headaches but the worst for me is the intense itching I am experiencing after sitting in the sun for about 30 minutes 4 days ago. I am having this terrible itching wherever the sun had touched but I did not get sunburned and there is not sign of a rash just the intense itching. This happened while I was on this medication about a year ago and the itching went away within a couple days but this time it just won’t quit and I am miserable. I quit taking this pill the day after the itching started because I remembered what happened last year and I will be talking to my pharmacist tomorrow to see what can help me find some relief.  Read More Read Less
204: If I did not take this drug I would sit in a puddle of tears 24/7.  It gave me my life back.
205: I started using this medication because it's supposed to help with neuropathic pain as well as for helping with bipolar II disorder. I found it to do fine for both. I rarely ver 5 star anything but I feel it's a good medication and more doctors are starting to give this out for neuropathy as well as lyrica.
206: IT MAKES ME VERY SLEEPY,OTHERWISE IT WORKS GREAT.KAT
207: I have been on this drug for 20+ yrs. I have not had any severe depression. I feel like myself. I take it at night which helps any drowiness. I can't live a good life without this drug. I had tried many others without success. A smart doctor put me on this drug and as I said before I feel like the me I lost for a period of time.
208: Have been on this for a year and am now being worked off it. Side effects are very bad and its not helping with the depression enough. I have had very bad vivid dreams most nights while on this, have had anxiety and panic attacks, and many cases of brain fog and confusion. However I know someone else on this medication and they don't have any problems whatsoever so as with my antidepressants you may find this to help you more than hurt you.
209: I was taking 150ml for about 6 months, then in June started taking 300ml.  The side effects slowly crept up all at once. Could not stand being in my body, once I saw all the side effects...I had ALL of them.  Was seeing a psychristrist.  I stopped taking (cut back slowly) and I am fine.  I would recommend it, but watch the side effects, hard to explain a blinding headache, dizziness, very angry, while shaking and thinking something is wrong (anxiety).
210: I am sleepy often
211: I think we are looking for that wonder drug that will take away the pain of depression. Effexor XR have helped me adapt to when I have a depressive episode happening. It dosent slove the issue of depression but allows for my body to be able to calm down. I have been on it for 20 years if not more.  I like it as it is something that allows me to still feel the low feeling, now I just can handle the situation better. I also work with a counslor 1 every two months. We all have to remember that our GAD or MDD is a gene and nothing wrong with having it. It is controling it
212: Good luck getting off this stuff. Was prescribed for anxiety caused by PVC's. Tired all the time and hard to reach the big "O". Decided to get off of it and it was pure hell. Finally did and everything works well now. I'll live with the irregular heartbeat.
213: I am 56. This Drug has helped me. Hot Flashes are not as bad. I was taking 35.mg and then my Doctor increased dosage to the 75.mg. I am calm and relaxed not as anxious. I don't have as much trouble sleeping. This drug works for me.
214: this med works when needed but please use as given
215: I was on V for about a month and a half after being on Pristiq for a year. Well I can say I havent been depressed since being on V but I also have absolutely NO emotions what so ever. At first I liked it because nothing bothered me but then I realized I didnt enjoy anything either. I didnt care about anything or anyone. I didnt even care about myself. I wasnt depresed sad happy mad or anything. I was an empty shell.
216: I have had an unexplainable, burning pain on the top of my head for two years.  The venlafaxine Oral gave me some relief from the pain. I now am taking venlafaxine with Neurotin and finding more relief, though I still have periods of pain each day. The side affects have been lethargy and weight gain (20 lbs) which make me very unhappy.
217: VELAFAXINE HCL 150MG IS WHAT ( I WAS ) TAKING.  I AM 46YRS OLD MALE  WITH E.D ISSUES BUT CORRECTABLE WITH MEDICATION . I HAVE LOST INTEREST AND NOT ABLE TO HAVE AN ERECTION. I AHAVE EXPERIENCE MILD TREMORS ,THOUGHTS OF HARMING MYSELF DURING STRESSFUL MOMENTS, I HAVE REALIZED THIS AND WILL WEAN MYSELF OFF.
218: Took my first pill last night and I am walking around my house this morning like I just got out of the bar and I am intoxicated. Have experienced a couple of side affects already this morning.
219: I have been on venlafaxine twice now for fybromyalgia pain and sleep issues.  My doctor explained that fybromyalgia symptons could be a result of lack of sleep or vise versa.  Well, the meds work great for helping me sleep better, therefore I am better rested and the pain symptoms disappear.  Some advice that I have found to be helpful:  always take it after a good breakfast or lunch to prevent the sick feeling.  DOn't take in the evening as it will lead to sleep issues.  Don't try to take a nap after you have takeen it, or you won't be able to get up! As long as I keep busy I am fine.  I have gained 25lbs, so have decided to reduce my dosage slowly and go off the meds again. I originally was on it for about 1.5 yrs, I was doing great so went off it.  They withdrawels are hard, but if you do it slowly its not unbearable.  It was nearly 2 yrs before my symptoms returned, and I went back on it
220: I have been on a higher dose of Effexor XR than what I am reading others are on. I have been on the same dose now for 10 years, with previously extreme panic disorder and social anxiety. I was in such bad shape I couldn't even go to school, sleep, or do much of anything for a good 1-2 years. My original trial with the drug was not successful, as the symptoms managed to linger and depression came from not feeling any relief. I was then tested with other drugs and eventually introduced again to Effexor XR but with a new dosage when new studies came out. It took about a month and a half for myself to notice improvement, but studies have shown this drug works completely differently depending on the exact dosage given. I am comfortably on 150mg+37.5mg, so 2 pills, and have been symptom free and depression free for about 10 years. 

This drug literally saved my life, but it is not perfect. The side effects of "forgetting" to take your daily dose can be very bad, but this is a far cry from the symptoms I had to once deal with. The difference in what the drug does from 150mg only to adding 37.5 mg more but staying under 225mg is amazing. I have been on higher than 225mg before and as low as one 37.5 pill. Im sure depending on what the exact ailment is, these different doses can help. For me personally, the key was sucking it up for the month and waiting for the drug to actually kick in. It is also a very good idea to monitor both your sodium levels and liver, as you can get very dehydrated in the summer months. 

The side effects for this drug are minimal in relation to almost all drugs in its category. Ive been on some very terrible ones. I would not take much stock in the negative reviews of people who weren't on this drug for at least a full month and a half and at a dosage of at least 75mg. This drug takes time to even kick in, at any dose. I can only speak on the efficacy for panic/social disorder w/ comorbid depression
Read More Read Less
221: Bipolar diagnosis since 2002. Lots of meds. Just started 2 weeks ago. Game changer. I feel like a different person so far. Just happier I think. But haven't gone into manic yet. So we will see. But why did we not start with thus one?
222: This was prescribed for me when I was diagnosed with a fatal, incurable disease and expected to live no more than a few months. I have been taking it these few months and it has really helped. I actually feel happier and more upbeat than before my diagnosis! Which is kind of crazy, but I'm grateful to spend this time enjoying my remaining life. I hope it helps you as well. :)
223: I have been on this drug for about a year now, recently went from 75mg a day to 150mg per day. Have noticed weight increase and muscle cramps (extremely painful). Has anyone else had the terrible muscle cramps, told my dr about it and she wants me to try calcium, magnesium or potassium?????
224: Worked well for depression,But weight gain is not good.Gained 35 pounds in 3 1/2 months scarey.But not depressed,legs aches and tried feeling,No ambition.And diet do not help.
225: I sleep alot too.  Does anyone else cut the pill to take half a pill one day and half another day?
226: I started this initially for depression and to treat GAD. At the 2 month mark I couldn't believe how effective it had become. My main issue was intrusive thoughts - I could deal with them with mindfulness but the thoughts just kept coming, unprovoked. Sometimes I'd feel panic in my chest before a thought would even appear

My life has changed. My coworkers marveled at the change in my work style and confidence, I recently got a promotion, I'm more social and relaxed before and during uncomfortable situations. I have the motivation to tackle work around the house - and I am happy. I couldn't believe it was possible to quiet a lifetime of intrusive and stress inducing thoughts

Spent a few months on 112.5mg XR before dropping to 75mg XR - at this dosage I don't experience any side effects. This drug really agrees with me, I can see from other reviews that some have had a hard time - don't let that stop you from trying something that could make a huge difference, like it did for meRead More Read Less
227: I take 150mg for fibromyalgia. I have tried Celexa and Lexapro in the past with minimal effectiveness. Both drugs dulled my emotions to the point that I was a jerk to my loved ones. My GP switched me to this since it was very effective in getting me through PTSD with few side effects 15 years ago. I started seeing results in about 2.5 weeks and now it has been months since I have had to take a Flexeril for pain. I also have less fatigue since I am not battling pain every day. I felt a little off this morning because I forgot to take it last night, but I took it around lunchtime and was back to myself within an hour.Read More Read Less
228: I was on fluoxitine for five years but wasn't that effective, I  have now been on venlafaxine for 18 months and it has been really affective, I feel normal again YaY!
229: This drug changed my life. I had major daily anxiety and tried a couple of anxiety/depression medications prior to Venlafaxine, but they made me sleepy. Venlafaxine does not make me sleepy and I have 0 anxiety anymore. One time I did miss 3-4 days of dosage and the withdrawal symptoms were horrible. I know now when it's time to end my medication, I will definitely taper off. I still 10/10 recommend Venlafaxine to anyone suffering from anxiety/depression.
230: I started on lowest dose 37.5 felt nothing. Later increased 75mg and am extremely tired all the time, dry mouth, sweats, dizzy, disoriented, confused, lack of focus and concentration and so many others.
  I do not feel like myself, sleep most of 1st 12 hours after the morning dose than am wired up all night long. Took away my ptsd and  panic but only to the point my body wouldn't react to them and I lay there emotionless with these thoughts and a terrible upset stomach from anxiety.
231: My Endocrynologist prescribed Venlaflaxine for me - in place of the EFFEXOR I had been taking for years. I was diagnosed with clinical depression in 1998. For ME, I find Venlafaxine to be nothing more than a medication to prevent me from suicidal thoughts. I am still VERY depressed.  I am always tired, highly stressed (I am on klonopin), and feel hopeless. If YOU ARE benfiting fron Venlafaxine, I wish you well. For me, it's not helpful.
232: lowers sex drive, but relieves anxiety and panic attacts
233: Feel better and had more energy and interest in things i used to do.
234: Up until last year I refused any kind of medication. I had a few side effects at the beginning but I carried on and learnt to deal with them. Now I don’t get any. One thing I have to say is don’t miss a day. The withdrawals are horrible. As for my mental health, I feel this medication has helped massively. I am less anxious, not overthinking or worrying so much. I don’t feel depressed constantly. My panic attacks have stopped which I never thought would happen.
235: Have swollen ankles, could Venlafaxine be causing this?
236: Works great for panic attacks but makes me really sick to my stmoach with or without food lasts for around 2 hours
237: made me very sick when first started, and carried on so when the dosage was increased. but moods have improved!
238: Helps to ease the stress,helps me to stay more calm,lessen's the worry factor. Glad  DR.put me on it. It does help.
239: I am 36 and have been taking this medication for somewhere around 12 years. I was prescribed this for Generalized Anxiety Disorder (GAD). I could not tolerate 150 mg as it made me feel crazy and depressed. I stayed on 75 mg for many years. Before this medication, I had severe vertigo, bright colors were very overwhelming, I could not think very clearly and I felt extreme emotions. This medication has cleared that up, even on the small dose of 18.75 mg that I have been on for the past year. I wanted off of this medication and have been trying to wean off of it for two years. I have been cutting my 37.5 mg pills in half and taking it in the morning. This has worked well for me. I decided to try weaning lower and cutting the half in half to make approximately 9.375 mg and that is when the EXTREME issues began. After two days at this dose, I woke up in the middle of the night with the most extreme stomach pain that I have ever felt in my entire life. I cried in pain for an hour before violently throwing up and then another hour of extreme pain before it subsided enough that I could go back to sleep. I was left with nausea for the next two weeks and one more night of waking up with stomach pain (the second time was less severe). On a different night I experienced severe chills and then once that subsided terrible sweats (I did not have a fever). I was irritable, irrational and had sobbing sessions throughout this entire time. One of the days I felt extreme rage because my food was cold and then proceeded to spend the entire afternoon sobbing off and on. I hated everybody and that is not who I normally am. My boyfriend and I both were so confused and didn't understand what was happening to me. We finally realized that it was likely the reduction in Effexor and after two weeks I went back on 18.75 mg. It took about two days and I was back to my normal happy and calm disposition. I have a hard time rating this medication because while it did not help with GAD, it did help with other issues. Had I been aware that if I missed a dose by a couple of hours, I would experience brain zaps, fogginess, nausea and just a general feeling of being off kilter, or that trying to get off of it would be pure torture then I probably would have never taken it and would have tried other things first. It is heartbreaking because I want to eventually get pregnant and feel that this little pill is going to be a huge barrier for that. And God forbid there was ever an issue and I could not get to my medication. That thought terrifies me. If you are in my position as well, you are not alone and I am so sorry that you are dealing with this hell and if you are thinking about starting this medication PROCEED WITH CAUTION!Read More Read Less
240: I was originally taking 37.5mg twice a day for over a month and it wasn't helping, (I also had a mild skin itching reaction) so my Dr. increased my dosage to 75mg twice a day and after taking the higher dosage for only about 3 days I noticed a big difference and I actually felt a lot better so I was happy with the new dosage until I had a SEVERE allergic reaction all over my legs, arms and stomach I have been itching severely for going on 5 days now, I've been to the ER twice, my regular Dr just yesterday finally and she thinks it is the Venlafaxine that is causing my allergic reaction so I didn't take any of the Venlafaxine yesterday or today and the itching is a little better but still there and I'm still completely miserable. I am very terrified about the withdrawl effects of me just abruptly stopping this medication, because I didn't sleep a wink last night, I was covered in sweat and had to change clothes twice during the night, along with having crazy nightmares, but that is what my Dr. said to do, so I have no clue what else I can do, I need the itching and red bumps and swelling and misery to go away! I hope this review helps someone out there, because like I said this drug worked great at the higher dosage other than me having the SEVERE allergic reaction to my skin.   Read More Read Less
241: I have terrible insomnia and was prescribed Exffor , but they gave me Venlafaxeen the generic.  After 1 pill I have the worst headache.  I felt soooo sleepy, but never could fall asleep.  So this morning I am reading all these posts and now I don’t know if I should continue to take it!  Did anyone out there take this for sleep disorder and find it wonderful?  Hearing about the withdraws really has me taken back, I don’t want to have to take this stuff for ever!!! Should I give it more time?? Ugh!!!Read More Read Less
242: I was very depressed for about 10 months. Just started meds and didn't notice any change in mood for 1 & 1/2 weeks. Its been a month now and i wish i felt a little better but definitely better then when i started. Only side effect noticeable is dry mouth.
243: I have only been on this drug for 1 to 2 mo.it seems to be helping me cope better in alot of ways, coping with other people and adjusting to the outside enviroment.
244: tROUBLE SLEEPING, BLOOD PRESSURE AND PANIC INCREASES, WEIGHT GAIN, SUPPOSE TO HELP LOSE WEIGHT NOT GAIN!
245: I had no adverse reactions to this medication and I generally react to most meds.   I had none of the withdrawal symptoms coming off of it and no side effects.  I think others may have been on a dose to high for them and the withdrawals were because of the amount they were taking.  This was the one medication that helped me cope through the sudden death of our daughter as the other drugs they gave me to try caused most of the reactions the people making comments below but I didn’t have anything using this drug. I hope those that did try it give it another try at a lower dose
246: I HATE this drug!  Not only has it not helped me in anyway whatsoever with depression and anxiety disorder after a year of taking it but I have gained 25 pounds all in the belly area.  I have never been this overweight even while pregnant!  Got help you if you miss a dose.  I get headaches and "brain zaps" something horrible. I'm trying to wean myself off of this medication slowly.
247: I've been taking this for 2 months now and I feel like my old self again. I'm sleeping well, have energy again, and am motivated to get things done for the first time in a couple of years. I have finally lost my feelings of not caring about things.
248: I have been taking this medicine for 4 years now in conjunction with another medicine for headaches and I have tried numerous times to get off this medicine with the help of my dr. and unfortunately  I am not able to due to the severe withdraw symptoms that I experience. They are horrifying, I can not function and have to be put back on this drug. I feel as if I should stop taking this drug, but can not due to with-draw symptoms.
249: Used for hot flashes and night sweats...experienced nausea and blahs hated it
250: This medication did help with my depression and anxiety greatly. But I suffered from the majority of the listed side effects. So much so that I could not tolerate it any longer.
251: I have been on this drug and have gained weight, but the reviews says a side effect is weight loss??? My depression and grief was getting worse and my doctor increases to 50mg twice a day.  I have had gastric bypass several yrs ago and fight my weight. Now I eat very little about 1000-1200 calories a day.  I have increased the dose 2 weeks ago, and have gained 13 lbs.  this makes me MORE depressed.  but the med is not helping and making me very sick to my stomach, dizzy and i now itch all over. I am going to wean myself off.Read More Read Less
252: Dr started me on 37.5 for two weeks then raised to 75.0 I noticed an improvement in two days of starting medication.  I don't like taking the 75.0 I felt better on the lower dose. I will ask Dr to give me the lesser amount.  Not having any side effects except the higher dose makes me sleep too much,, I went from 8 - 9 hrs a night to 14 - 18 hrs.  I almost feel comatose.  but no problem once I get up.
253: This medication has been a life-saver for me thus far. I originally started on a 150 mg dosage which was effective for several months when combined with therapy and other mental health treatments, but a bump up to 225 mg was necessary. Side effects included some difficulty sleeping, nearly constant yawning, and reduced appetite, but my body adjusted to them around 2 weeks into treatment. Great medication for both depression and anxiety.
254: I’ve only been on this a day and for the first time I did not at any point in the day feel that dark cloud, have sad scary self defeating thoughts , simply god sent
255: The side effects of this medicine are terrible, but after trying almost everything else, it's the only thing that works. Mentally I feel like myself again. I have been taking it for about 5 years and I'm up to 225mg. I have trouble sleeping and terrible night sweats. Also if I'm even a couple hours late taking it in the morning I feel nauseous, dizzy and anxious. I tried to go off it once and it was horrible. I'm sort of worried about the long term effects of my high dosage. As for drinking, the only weird reaction I have is that i don't feel the alcohol as much
256: I had a bad reaction to this drug the first (and last!) time I took it.  I was prescribed a low dose of Venlafaxine which was supposed to gradually increase to replace the Bupropion I am taking.  I took my medications around 8 - 9 AM.  Around 10 - 10:30 AM I started feeling so sick and dizzy I actually started crying.  I felt like I was going to die and I didn't know if I was going to be able to drive to work.  Thankfully, the symptoms went away within an hour, but I was unable to get decent sleep for three nights afterwards despite taking a sleep aid.  I only took the one pill and will never take it againRead More Read Less
257: Effexor XR brand name works much better than the generic venalfaxine for me.  I noticed a huge difference in my mood affect when taking the generic and had to switch back to the brand, which works incredibly well.  I don't know what the difference is.
258: Everyone is unique, but I have been on this med for just over a month and it has been by far the most effective one I've tried.  I've been on (and occasionally off) various meds for about 19 years now.      As far as the occasional alcoholic drink, I have limited myself to drinking at only one meal per week thus far, and have felt no impact whatsoever from those drinks.
259: I have been on venlafaxine for nearing a year now, i'm currently on 150mg XR dose. this drug is a life saver, from being extremely depressed and anxious, staying home all the time being unemployed and unable to work due to my fear of the outside world. screw the withdrawal, this has given me my energy and life back. the best i’ve felt in years, i allowed my depression and anxiety to control me and at 23 have missed a huge part of my life due to it. i recommend this but also know that every person is different and do think everyone should be able to find the script for them
260: I've taken this medication, along with Wellbutrin, for 2+ years and it's effectivness is consistant.
261: works ok. Caused me to have chest tightness. Dr's thought it was asthma that was uncontrolled and have been treated with steroids. Has the worst ever withdrawals coming off of it. Cold sweats, body aches, horrible headache. Its not worth it . You miss one days and you will regret it.
262: Took this drug one day felt numbness in both arms and the joints in my fingers ached. I did not continue taking this medication.
263: I took it for 6 years. The HORRIBLE thing about this medicine is if you're trying to get off of it because it stops working for you. It gives SERIOUS Withdrawl issues. Think twice before starting this medication.
264: Holy wow! Listen. I have had terrible reactions to Wellbutrin and Cymbalta. Both going on and off the medications gave me such bad side effects that I developed an aversion to taking antidepressants at all. I've been suffering from fatigue, mood swings, depression, and crippling anxiety/panic attacks. It got to the point that I could barely have a cup of coffee every morning because the caffeine was too much for my nervous system.

I tried some anti-anxiety meds such as clonazapem and buspar, but had dizziness and brain zaps (with the latter). And they didn't give me that "good" feeling. That "I'm normal again" feeling. 

I've been on this medication for a week and just went up to the 75 mg this morning. On my way to get lunch I was like "Oh my goodness - the last time I felt like this was when I was a teenager." I'm almost 30. The anxiety is almost muted out. I had a cup and a half of coffee yesterday for the first time in a decade. I feel amazing - happy - and energetic. I feel like I want to do things again. I feel like I did when I was a kid - excited just to be alive. 

Side effects wise I can't really offer much because I'm taking anti-nausea meds to beat the nausea that this antidepressant causes. That's doing the trick for me. I will say that my appetite has decreased. Amazing because I also deal with binge eating. I haven't had a true binge since starting this medication and have started eating/ordering smaller portions. I'm hoping to lose some weight. 

Overall my experience has been excellent. I'm sure the withdrawal will be difficult, but with the way I'm feeling now I'd say that it's worth it. Never want to go back to the way I was
265: I've been using this drug for 3 months and I am very happy about it.  My whole life I've been depressed.  I took Zoloft for some time but I didn't feel myself.  With Venlafaxine I feel myself again, I enjoy more.
266: Terrible, I was out of it everyday and still having panic attacks
267: satisfied worked
268: Have had depression all my life.  This has taken care of it.  No sex drive.  Some difficulty urinating.  It's expensive
269: this medication has worked for me for the last couple of years. but i want to get off of it am i am affraid of what will happen. but overall it has worked.
270: I like this medication very much, but I broke out with body rashes. My dr said to discontinue taking this meds.
271: I have been on it for a week now , have been on it in the passed and had great results this time its doing me in . Shakes , dry mouth , headaches,nausea and i feel high all the time .My husband keeps telling me how massive my pupils are . I had none of these the 1st time i took them .... sooooo i guess its a toss up for me . I will wait out the 2 weeks and see what is what .
272: I am having difficulty taking this drug.  I am having memory loss,headache,rapid heartbeat.  I have lowered myself to 75mg from 225mg.  I do have a doctors appt in 2 wks. I did try to take less than the 75 and ended up vomiting and  diarrhea. I finally started reading up on this drug and realized a lot of my feelings and the change in me has been attributed to the medicine. Hopefully I can reverse the sympoms that have plague me.
273: I had one 37mg and within an hour felt strange I felt very chilled clammy/tingle hands and feet high BP called 111 advised to visit A&E couldn't sleep felt very alert wide awake It did stop the hot flushes but I didnt sleep properly for 2 nights Wont be taking again
274: I've been on the drug since I was 14. While it helped with my depression, it has had long lasting side effects. Whenever I miss a dosage I go through crippling withdrawals. One time i ran out of a refill and went 2 days without it. I slept for 20 hours straight and wasn't able to wake up. Now I'm 22 and I've been  trying to get off this drug for over a year. Its taking so long because my body goes through withdrawals every time the decrease the dosage. This worked for my depression. This drug is psychoactive and alters your brain chemistry. This drug alleviates your depression but only masks the actual issue.Read More Read Less
275: Effexor was the first anti-depressant I used and it worked miraculously. When I lost my insurance, I thought that venlafaxine would work just as well but it had not. I'm susposed to start weaning off this week but I'm really scared. I have a 1 year old and even when I've been late taking my pill, I've gotten very ill. When I did take it, I got very tired and dizzy.
276: Have been on this med for about 10 years, works for me but trying to get off this medication has very bad withdrawals, unbearable!!! And I only take the lowest dosage 37.5mg
277: I needed something to build me up and not make me sleepy. This makes my stomach feel a little quesy and I feel weak when taking it. I need to have more energy not something like this to take it away!
278: This medication almost destroyed my life. I went on it originally because I was having anxiety. It basically made me numb. I was delusional and extremely manic on this medication. I almost lost my job and my relationship as well. When I finally got off of it, the side effects were awful. It took me about a good 8 to 12 mths for me to get back fully after this medication. I now only take Buspar for meds. My doctor tried to put me on another med and I said HELL NO!!
279: I have been on this medication for a little more than a year now and I have seen tremendous strides in my anxiety. The medicine works in that it takes the edge off of my anxiety while keeping all other aspects of my life normal. I have seen very slight side effects, including minor weight loss and strange dreams. Overall, the benefits completely outweigh the negatives. Regarding all the negative reviews, I think that this drug works very well for very specific people - if you think it might work for you at least try it out (with assistance from your doctor, in case you need to ween yourself back off) because it has been a god send for me
280: 2 yrs. ago took Cymbalta..worked GREAT..then my insurance company removed it from the 'approved' list of anti-depressants!    ..then switched to Effexor..seemed OK..not as "smooth" as the Cymbalta; but still worked for my depression symptoms..costly just like the Cymbalta tho.    ..2 months ago picked up my Effexor (I thought)..informed by the pharmacist that NOW there is a generic for the Effexor and it's this venlafaxine ER Oral..it's just 10 BUCKS!!    My reaction to this drug/change is nominal..I DID find out that if you MISS it or take it at a DIFFERENT time than usual; I experience extreme disorientation/euphoric high...some nausea..just feel bad until much later that same day..symptoms are gone the next day...  which is why I gave it 3 stars for   satisfaction!!Read More Read Less
281: I`m got to tell you I like this drug. I have my energy back,no more racing thoughts,no more feelings of uselessness,no more anxiety.I`m going through menopause now and have had problems with depression all my life. This drug is a god-send for me. THe side affects are pretty rough but for me it works and my husband noticed it right away,the worry wrinkle on forehead has all but disappeared.
282: I notice no difference when I take it but when I discontinue I have strange nervous feeling.  I hate the dreams that I have while taking this medication.  The cure seems to be worse than the "disease". Is there an alternative without the side effects?
283: started this drug about 4 months ago  and getting on fine, feel in a much better mood and happy to be doing things now, however forgot to take the pills with me while away for 2 days ( on 150mg) and then noticed side affects, severe dizzieness (no way you could drive) unable to sleep and totally soaked through with sweat during the night, nice.
284: I have been taking Effexor ER 75mg. 3xday for at lease 4 years, when you also take other psych. drugs it's often hard to tell whats working and whats not, at least for me. I would have to say as far as my depression being lessened on Effexor, my depression is the same
285: I take 225mg a day, and have been for 7 years now. I don't think it is working well and I am always sweating. I still have the same symptoms, but not as sever. I am more irritable and get real grouchy with my roommate. Definitely not a "happy pill".
286: I have been depressed since I was a teenager a fact I came to realize only after beginning psychiatrict treatment ten years ago. I always masked and avoided well and did my suffering in private. I have held very responsible jobs but fought myself all the way. Menopause, two deaths in the family, my husband in surgery and a new job that didn't fit triggered a major deppressive episode and I began treatment. Effexor XR and then the generic venlafaxine has enabled me to lead a great life on the inside as well as the out.  I take 225 mg in the morning. If I forget I am in trouble by 2 - 3 o'clock with the withdrawal symptoms we all know and hate. So, I don't forget and I always carry spares with me.  I do have other side effects, my sex drive is reduced to almost zero, I sleep very poorly, I don't have as much energy as I would like BUT none of those things is anywhere near as devastating as the black hole of depression. I exercise, eat well, associate with positive, active people and now retired indulge myself in things I enjoy.   I no longer see a psychiatrist, my family doctor manages my meds. I did wean off the med about 5 years ago. It took about 6 months. My psychiatrist handled it by reducing 37.5 mg every month and then when we reached 37.5 mg he had a pharmasist make 18.75 capsules and I got off. Three months later I had a major episode and I will never fool myself into thinking that my depression is cured again.   I am on Venlafaxine for life and while I don't like it I would be dead by suicide if I were not.  Read More Read Less
287: The only bad side effect I have had with this drug is excessive weight gain. I have been on it for close to 3 yrs. & recently decided to be weaned off do to weight. I've decided to deal with the weight as opposed to the miserable with draw symptoms, easily irritated, SEVERE leg aches & over emotional. The benefits of effexor out weigh the gaining of weight
288: I was deeply depressed for 9 months. This medicine finally brought me out of it and leveled me off~!! Definitely SAVED MY LIFE~! :D
289: do not let your pill doctor make you take this drug.  its the worst antidepressant i have ever taken.  i quit cold turkey and feel ten thousand times better than i did while on this wicked med. side effects of cold turkey were nominal for me.  DONT USE THIS PRODUCT!
290: I was on this drug for about 10 months.  I started taking it because I had no energy to get up off the couch and do anything.  Within a couple of weeks I started feeling much better, got up off the couch and started walking.  After a couple of months I had lost over 20 pounds.  I decided to stop taking it because of a pre-existing bruising problem that had gotten somewhat worse.  I was afraid to stop taking it because of all the negative reviews that I had read about withdraw symptoms.  I took about 3 months to wean myself off and had no problems at all.  This med might not be right for everyone, but it worked for me
291: I had to be hospitalized for 2 weeks in an mental health facility. The Psychiatrist switched my depression drug I had been taking from a Prozac derivative to Venlafaxine (Efexor} because she had had such positive results in patients than any other depression medication. Within a week I could tell a huge difference in relief from depression and anxiety. I truly feel great now and highly recommend this drug. It has renewed my joy in life!!!
292: I have been on Effexor XR 75mg for 4 years and loved it. I recently changed to generic because of cost.  I hate it!  I feel like a space cadet, nausous, and unlike my out going self.  I would not recommend.
293: I began this med because my panic attacks/panic disorder was getting worse, and I needed a change.  I certainly got that.  Within the first week, I basically lost my appetite.  By the fourth week, I was constantly nauseated, had started hearing/seeing things that weren't there, talking full volume in my sleep all night long, kicking and twitching legs in my sleep, and was in a foul mood pretty much all the time.  By the fifth week I decided to stop taking this after a two-day marathon of vomiting every hour.  Legs jumping/shaking uncontrollably.  I went two days without being able to keep food or liquids down at all.  Which meant I couldn't keep any pills down...which lead to starting withdrawal.    With panic attacks I'm pretty used to feeling crummy, but this drug...felt like poison.  I'm thrilled for people that it worked for but that wasn't me, not by a long shot.  I know I'm probably an outlier but wow.  Never been that sick in my life.    If you DO decide to take this medication, make sure if you're feeling lousy you're keeping in touch with your doctor.  I probably should have gone to the ER, in retrospect.    Make sure you start this drug sloooowly and if you come off it, come off it the same way.  Be careful out there, kids.  Good luck to you all and God Bless.Read More Read Less
294: This is the first time I took medication for anxiety and it was absolute HELL. Made me feel extremely nauseous, weak and sweaty. I felt ten times worse. Had suicidal thoughts. I even had hallucinations only 3 days in!! Completely HORRIBLE. Also the withdrawals made me feel like a crack head :(
295: I have taken venlafaxine for several years. When taking this med you should take it at the same time every day, and never let the med run out because the withdrawal side effects are not nice. Vertigo, dizziness, and what I like to call brain zaps a very unpleasant feeling in your head. It is very difficult for me to be weaned off so now I take a very low dose every day. When I say weaned off, your doc. has to subscribe a lower dose, that you take less and less of for 1 to 2 weeks. You cannot quit cold turkey because it will mess you up.Read More Read Less
296: I have been on this for years and do not feel it is anylonger effective. Dr tried to take me off and the withdrawl is horrible. I would not recomend this to anyone. "Brain zaps" are the worst.
297: Doctor took me off Citalopram as the dose was too low, put me Venlaxfine, if you're reading this DO NOT TAKE, they are causing me insomnia sleep from 4.30am to 18.00, then feel useless, no energy, no life.  DO NOT TAKE!!!
298: Withdrawl over a week from this was sheer hell, had to go to the ER at one point with sever hypertension, mood was worst it had ever been in my life. Shortness of breath, SEVERE NAUSEA, insomnia, chest pains, and constant overload of adrenaline so bad it hurt. Had to have another dose 2 weeks in to reduce withdrawl symptoms. You should taper this over a month or two, not a week, no benefit, AVOID AT ALL COSTS.
299: An absolute nightmare. It causes severe apathy, lack of any sort of creativity and insomnia. Furthermore, it makes you feel like you're going literally insane, my mind was reeling and screaming 24/7 and I came close to ending it or self admitting numerous times. Would NOT recommend. Hell drug.
300: I have been on this for a few years now. I took lexapro for 1 month previously and had terrible side effects. This has less mental side effects but I am tiring of the physical side effects(diarrhea, sweating, high blood pressure). Thinking about trying pristiq.
301: I have experienced some of the side effects mentioned. Unusual/excessive sweating, waking up at odd times thru the night, yawning and lack of sex drive.
302: I've only taken Venlafaxine two days (at 37.5 dosage) and have experienced nausea, extreme thirst and had a major headache on day 2.....after reading previous posted comments, I think my "change of life" symptoms weren't so bad....
303: This drug is good I suppose I still sleep all day and dont want to get out of bed BUT i used to cry if you look at me the wrong way id bust out in tears..And I dont do that anymore
304: To give you a little background, I am on the 75mg dose and have been on a few other anxiety medications previously.    This is the single worst medication I have ever been on. It causes severe vertigo which prevents me from even leaving the house which is the reason I started taking it in the first place. Otherwise, it has given me night sweats, horrific dreams (think about the movie saw only being able to experience the pain associated with it). If you get the choice, get off this medication as soon as possible.Read More Read Less
305: This is one of the few anti-depressant/anti-anxiety medications I have been able to tolerate after 30 years of feeling like a guinea pig and mostly not taking medications due to side effects.  A genetic test revealed I should not be taking SSRIs or many other medications.  Everybody is different, but this has been the most effective I have ever tried, with no obvious side effects.
306: If I forget even a few hours of this medication I get sick.  Nauseous, sweats, dizziness, muscle weakness.  My heart rate is up very high and I think this medication is very bad for me!  I am waiting to see a doctor so I can wean myself off of this without getting really ill!  Don’t use this medication!
307: After trying Prozac, Zoloft, and Abilify (over 6 years) for anxiety and depression, this one finally did it. I am much calmer in times of stress and don't fly into "crisis mode" as often. I haven't had a panic attack since beginning it in early September. The only bad thing is that you REALLY have to stick to your regimen. I missed it two days in a row and had withdrawal symptoms so badly I thought I had the flu. But as long as I remember to take it I don't experience problems. When I first went on, and when my dosage increased, I experienced a lot of dry mouth, but that was it.Read More Read Less
308: My ENT advised me after  8 months Vertigo  from a Vestibular Migraine to take Venlafaxine ER 37.5 mg capsules. I took one and 2 hours later my vertigo was 80% gone. On WebMd they do advise to watch your blood pressure.. 16 hours later at 2am I woke up with a blinding headache. I checked my blood pressure and it was at  196/121. Off to the Emergency room I went. After they gave me one Clonidine 0.1mg 1 hour later my BP was at 115/74. I think I'll take the vertigo over a Stroke.
309: to the woman who asked about switching from EFFEXOR to VENLAFAXINE, i began taking effexor (75mg) about 9 months ago for depression and an anxiety disorder. i made the switch to generic several months ago and the only change i noticed was the additional side effect of slight nausea. i also still had all of my original side effects of jitteriness, dizziness and mood swings, though all of these have lessened greatly over time. aside from side effects, i didn't see any change in the drugs effectiveness at treating my depression or anxiety.Read More Read Less
310: I have questions about withdrawal symptoms and I can not find any about this drug. I have not taken this for 7 days. No brain zaps, but I am having diarrhea, racing/irregular heart beat, night sweats, bad dreams, etc....... Can anyone relate? Please help!!!!!
311: My Dr. took me off of celexa due to panic attacks and put me on this stuff. Now, I'm like a ticking time bomb, headahes, nervous, trembling, every side effect and more!!! How do I get off of it????
312: Just a warning.  I accidently have been taking more than double the prescribed dose for the past week.  I wondered why my vision was blurry to the point of not being able to read.  I was having headaches, etc.  My Dr. had changed my prescription from 1 150mg and 1 75mg a day to 3 75 mg per day.  His instructions were unclear so I kept taking the 150mg as well.  I've learned a valuable lesson that could have been more dangerous than it was.  READ, READ, READ.
313: fatigue
314: I was put on this for menopausal syptoms, severe! I have been on it for 4 months now and I am so very happy! I was getting hot flashes at least 10 times a day and at night as well. My hot flashes went away with the first pill, now that I have been on it a while, I do get a hot flash maybe 3 or 4 times a week is all! I am happy again and full of energy. I have read that is lowers your libido, however; I have NOT experienced that at all. (good for my husband!) I had nausea the first time I took it but that was on an empty stomach. I drink a glass of milk or a slimfast shake with it now. I would recommend this to anyone going through menopause.  Read More Read Less
315: it works well for me however I have no insurance and it is very expensive
316: I began taking the brand XR form almost 10 years ago.  When I missed one dose I went into a withdrawal-like ("discontinuation") syndrome.  Brain zaps. anxiety, nausea, and more.  I was able to reduce the dose over a long period of time, then switched to the generic immediate release.  I am stuck at 50 mg am and 25 mg pm.  Every time I try to cut back I go into the "discontinuation syndrome".  I hate to think I'm going to be stuck on this all my life!  Occasionally I do forget to take my meds, especially if I'm away from home.  When I forget to take the morning meds, I'm in the discontinuation syndrome state by that evening. Than it's too late to do anything about it.    Miserable.      I have contacted the FDA and the manufacturer.  I still haven't heard anything back.    Also, my Medicare Part D provider has decided to raise the GENERIC venlafaxine to tier 2, which means I will pay full price from now until the end of the year.  Yet I can't get off the med.  What to do?    The drug companies (like Wyeth) have me over a barrel.Read More Read Less
317: I used this drug for 1 year in fighting depression.It did help with that, but the depression was stemming from the effects of undiagnosed multiple sclerosis. It is now 2 years later and I have developed a cataract of my right eye. Though small and only one eye, it is still troubling. It was just masking the real problem.I would NOT recommend this drug.
318: I feel more in tone to whats around me and listen more closer to conversations.
319: My husband was in a car accident in 2008 , thwn was getting epidurals for pain 1 was infected and he was hospitalized for 72 days. finally dignosed with ostomylitis, still out of work . we are behind in our bills, our lives have changed drastically I was the sole caretaker, we have a 15 year old and I work part time. I was now diagnosed with fibromyalgia . Needless to say I am a little depressed along with the pain the doctor prescribed this for me because our insurance wouldn't cover cymbalta. The only thing it makes me shaky and gives me headaches once in awhile is this normal?   Read More Read Less
320: I was violently sick three hours after taking the first pill.
321: I took this medicine for four years and then decided I didn’t need it anymore. It took me a few months to get off of it but once I started lowering my dose every week I had minimal withdrawal effects. Just be patient when tapering off! I just started taking it again for GI issues, I’m two days in and I’m already feeling better. I’m not getting the start up side effects like I did the first time I started the medicine (I think because I’m on a low dose and because it’s extended release.) Be patient. Take it with food. Don’t miss a dose. Get your refill a few days before you need it. Take some Dramamine to help you sleep in the beginning. That’s my advice! Read More Read Less
322: mood,sleep,energy,productity are normal.
323: I think this medication should be outlawed.  The side effects of withdrawals are really scary...dizziness, lightheadedness, nausea, memory loss, confusion, anxiety...I believe this is designed for one to be on for the remainder of their life.
324: very heavy sedation even at the lowest dose
325: Venlafaxine gave me my first sign of hope back. Along w/depression were anxiety/panic attacks, agoraphobia(afraid to go out in crowds, Was not in good situation, But now I can drive again, go intown, I am able to re-start my life with some energy. Sometimes I feel tired & flushed, but have no weight gain. My Migraine medication did not work with this medication, so I had to change that. Overall for me so far it has been worth it. I do not cry all the time, and I am not afraid to do errands. Its a start.     Read More Read Less
326: I have been on Venlafexine for about 2 years.It has helped greatly with my depression, but I have gained 25 lbs!!! I have bouts with vertigo and can't figure out if it's when I skip a day or two or what! Like right now while I'm writing this, I have dizziness and I haven't taken it for 2 days. I am calling the doc tomorrow b/c I can't seem to lose weight!!! I only eat about 1200 cal.per day!
327: Since taking Venlafaxine, I have a terrible taste in my mouth all of the time.  I have taken HBP meds, Prilosec, vitamins, etc for years, and I have never had this happen.  What can I do for it.  The medicine is helping with the Hot Flashes, but the taste is almost unbearable.
328: I just dont feel right almost as if im comming out of my skin..i feel restless cant sit still at times, very tired, sick to my stomach and iv only been taking it for 3 days!
329: I  was on Effexor XR for over 10 years and had no problems with anxiety or panic attacks. I  worked fine for me. Then came the generic brand & Medicare & the part D Plans stopped paying for the name brand,  Effexor. I haven't felt the same since. I've had 3 panic attacks since March. The generic is not as good or it just doesn't work for all people. I feel like I'm moving in slow-motion & sideways also. I haven't had those systoms since 2000! If you experienced changes, please report them to the FDA! Otherwise, they will never know! Read More Read Less
330: My doctor thought that would be a good idea to treat my generalized anxiety. The first dose was horrible about 40 minutes after the first dose 37.5 mg I had tremors shaking fainted, felt like the ground was pulled away under my feet had to call 911 was completely out of my control vomiting shortness of breath chest pain I couldn't hardly believe it only took one pill. The ER did a cardiac workup, gave me Ativan, and IV fluids to try to flush it to mitigate it I stayed there until the drug peaked and then started coming down. But here two days later I wake up and I'm feeling kind of shaky. This stuff is dangerous.  Read More Read Less
331: Very good until my stomach took it out exactly as i swollowed it.
332: first time went without panic attackes for 3months and counting
333: There are 2 generic producers.  I was previously on the Effexor XR when switched to the product by TEVA I had severe side effects, headaches, crying, deepened depression, suicidal thoughts etc.    Due to insurance changes I have been changed to 50 mg 3 times a day rather then the extended release.  This new product is manfactured by a different company and seems to be working well.    I did report both to TEVA and the FDA my reactions to their medication. Although the active ingredient is the same, there is something in the xr pill by TEva that I could not metabolize therefore it was just as if I was on no medication at all.    The extended release generic by TEVA is no good for me bit the regular release 3 times a day by the other manufacturer has been doing well for me.Read More Read Less
334: I’ve been on venlafaxine for just over a year. I was on sertraline for around 6 months prior to that. When life feels this bad it’s hard to know when it’s your depression or a bad reaction from medication. I was on the highest dose of venlafaxine they offer and it didn’t help at all — at least in any noticeable way. I don’t think I got worse and I don’t think I’ve had any bad reactions from the medication. It just did nothing really.

My depression symptoms include pretty bad fatigue, social avoidance/anxiety, sleeplessness and oversleeping, a consistent state of joylessness, apathy, and general feeling of futurelessness (not a word but a good descriptor). 

In some ways, I wish this medication had done something, even if it were a bad reaction. Having absolutely no reaction makes me feel like maybe this is just me? I’m trying Lexapro next and will be making a doctor supervised transition. Definitely nervous about the withdrawal from venlafaxine because I’ve heard it can be bad. Fingers crossed.

Hope this review helps. Good luck!Read More Read Less
335: Do not run out of this med. You will go out  of your gourd and drive your family crazy! I get very anxious, can't sleep without jumping up from anxiety. Also get zaps in the brain!
336: There is some dependance (no matter what physicians say).  Try going 3 days without. I get very vulnerable emotionally and pendulum with my thoughts and feelings. However, drug is overall positive.
337: I was on this medication for three months.  I was always on the lowest dose, 37.5ml.  I was told to quit cold turkey because it was making me have severe memory loss, sweating, shortness of breath and inability to wake up.  With stopping I have experience and continue to experience, ringing in my ears, nausea, and dizziness, sure hope this gets better.
338: I have been taking this for 4 months.  My issues were constant anxiety that resulted in insomnia, anger and frustration, and often confusion and disorientation.  It has helped the most with anxiety stemming from social situations, and calming the constant anxious thoughts that were causing a lot of my confusion and stress.  It has not helped as much as I had hoped with anger and frustration during stressful situations.  The first 2 weeks were awful, I was exhausted all day but had brain "zaps" and restless legs at night that kept me awake.  Thankfully that went away.  Read More Read Less
339: I began taking 75mg of this in place of 20mg of Lexapro (weening on/off), but this is the 3rd week and I have already walked off my job, can't get out of bed or stop crying, very depressed -- none of which i have ever experienced in my 48 yrs except when I was put on Sarefem 10 yrs ago.  I have blood in my stool, sweat profusely, headaches and no apetite for food or sex, both of which are also extreme changes in my mood.  Getting off this stuff as soon as I can!
340: I have just started this medication. I am getting married next weekend and was wondering if you can have a few drinks while on this. Can someone let me know if they drink while taking this medication. Thank you..
341: Yes it works for me but if I forget to take it I have dizz spells and fells like I very stressed I have tried to get off of it but have had no luck with that I ran out of med for about 4 days I had to go back on it was getting head ach and dizz and I was very stressed without it
342: I took effexor a few years ago, and it was very effective. It even stopped my hot flashes. This time it caused extreme anxiety. I had to stop taking after 3 weeks. Even after I stopped I still experienced the anxiety for another 2 weeks.
343: It was really life changing for me taking this. Iâ??ve been on so so so many other things when this finally worked it made such a difference
344: I'm suffering from depression from age of 14. I recently started taking this medicine. My doctor advised me to quarter of tablet for first week then half for next week then whole 75mg tablet once a day for a year. It has little side effects like I'm suffering from constipation
345: I've been depressed for about 10 years trying several different types of antidepressants. One night I got so low I tried to commit suicide and was then placed in a mental health facility for about 2 weeks. They took me off my Zoloft and put me on this. After everything I just have to say you can't wait expecting it to not work. I looked forward to it and I finally feel happy!
346: Has worked very well for my depression. It has caused a decrease in my sexual desire and has caused a problem with being able to ejaculate during sexual intercourse.
347: taking v75mg for anxiety and clonazepam 1mg for panic attacks notice im real tired and have muscle aches and headaches also family say im not the same person I dont care about anyone anymore sleep alot.anybody else taking these two been on them 3 years?
348: I'm very nervous I just started taking this medication and read all the side effects I'm 20 and have had bad anxity and depression for past 5 years is there anything o should be aware of from taking this medication
349: My doctor prescribed Venlafaxine for mild depresssion, but more so for chronic joint & muscle pain.  So far this has eliminated 75-80% of the pain & I have a much happy outlook on life. The only down side is the increased sweating & my pharmacist suggested trying the extended release form, so will check with my doctor regarding this.
350: My NET prescribed this medicine my Vestibular Migraines. Basically I have had vertigo for now going on 7 months. Did not know what this was until I looked it up on this site.
After reading these comments there is no way I'm taking this drug. This has nothing to do with helping with vertigo, unless he just wanted me to not care that I occasionally spin out and fall. Yeah thanks no thanks.
351: My doctor decided upped my dosage from 37.5mg  ( which I was on for 1 week )to 75mg. That's when the problems started!! First I was exhausted all day so I started taking it at night. Then after 2 weeks I woke up with slight facial swelling in my chin. By the end of the day my chin and bottom lip were huge and I had massive hives all over my body! Not knowing I went to a allergist who didn't think it was a drug allergy so we did blood work and put me on prednisone for 5 day. Well at day 5 the hives were gone but I had started taking my mess again so of course the hives came right back. I since saw my counselor and he switched my meds to wellbutrine 200 mg. I can't say it's working as well but I thankfully don't have hives!!! Read More Read Less
352: After years of depression and many different meds thanks to insurance co rules and regs I have never had such a tramatic reaction to any drug as this one. Within 2 wks I had almost every side effect listed. I couldnot function or even drive without fear. My docs advice "I didn't stay on long enough" So now I need a new psych as well as a new drug. I also was fine on Effexor until my insurance forced me on this generic. They are not all equal subs for the brand names.
353: end up in the ER with chest pain ? It Was a panic attack !Not happy at all! I'm not depressed at all just pain with my legs
354: I have only been on this drug for 3 days but  have been on and continue  to be on paxil((18 yrs)The side effect of excessive sweating is very hard to take. Does it go away?
355: I have just been switched from Lexapro to Venlafaxine.  I was and am scared to take this drug due to the withdrawals my friend has when she misses a dose.  This has been prescribed to me in hopes to help relieve my pain associated with Fibromyalgia, and to give me more energy.  This is day 3 for me.  Waking up more easier without feeling completely out of it.  I do feel a little  nauseas and have a slight headache.  And I feel like I am getting Hot Flashes.  But it does seem to help my pain in the morning, so far.  I am still scared to be taking this drug though.  I also have moderate depression and anxiety.  So We will see if it helps me there too, so far I feel even.  Not up nor down.Read More Read Less
356: I have been on this for a month and it has help me with my panic attacks
357: I  have been taking this for about 4-5 months. i have noticed a difference in my mood and i am definetly not living in a fog anymore, however the side effects have take some time to get used . I sweat alot more, i'm dizzy, had loss of appetite. I feel sometimes that i could close my eyes and fall asleep at any given moment. i  also notice that if i miss two days i have withdrawal symptoms. i just wonder if that means i will have to be on this forever. it seems very strong.
358: Saved my life...
359: My doctor prescribed Effexor in October, 2004, as treatment for depression.  Began on 37.5 and gradually increased to 150 mg of extended release daily.  It has been a major factor in improving my quality of life; experienced some sleepiness initially but that has diminished.  I could tell a difference within a week of having started even the lowest dose.  Missed two doses due to a stomach virus at one point and the effects of withdrawal were immediate and severe.  I'm very careful to take it at exactly the same time every day, and with food.  It has helped me regain focus and experience less stress at work and at home.  I asked about changing to the generic due to the cost but my doctor did not recommend it as the XR version is not available as a generic, and his confidence in the quality of the generic was not very high.Read More Read Less
360: The drug has helped with the pain but I have so little energy to do anything and if I miss a dose It takes a couple days to recover from the negative side effects. I am useless for the better part of 2 days. I would avoid this drug if at all possible just because of the side effects.
361: Have been using this medication for 9 months. Over this time frame,I have experienced,heart flutter,erratic heart rate,erratic blood pressure,trouble breathing,weight gain,constantly focused on thinking of past Tramatic experiences, hallucinations.
362: It take the peaks and valleys off the day. I started to try to get off it but life had other designs. Things don't bother me as much I don't get as upset about things -it does make me tired and has reduced sexual desire. I have to take it directly after eating or I have upset stomach. Also, I take it with allergy pill or my limbs and stomach feels itchy. I wish there was better alternative and I don't understand what is being said about effexor recall and how its related to venlafaxine? Also concerned with what other posts are saying about getting off of this drug.Read More Read Less
363: I have taken Venlafaxine HCI Oral for over 15 years alone with Buproprin SR.  I have tried to get off the medication twice with bad withdrawal systems.  It was too difficult for me to go through I decided to go back.
364: I started taking Effexor Dec.07 really like how it worked, but caused my cycles to be very heavy. My doctor switched me to the generic brand (Venlafaxine 75mg) It seemed to increase my libido, but I yawn all the time, concentration and memory is way out of wack, and night sweats are horrible. Doctor is now trying to wean me off this med., currently taking 37.5mg, every other day but hate the dizzinesss and gittery feeling, possibly due to withdrawl. Hopefully, that will soon pass. The venlafaxine also seemed to make me a little irritable.Read More Read Less
365: I started out with a dose of 37.5 mg for my severe peripheral neuropathy in my toes and upper feet. When that didn't make much of a difference - my Gabapentin/Neurontin had basically become ineffective - they raised my dose to 75 mg. I couldn't tolerate it, and both the higher and lower doses gave me chronic constipation and nausea, along with undesired weight loss. So every couple of days I take 37.5 mg, along with 600 mg of Gabapentin in the morning and 6-900 mg at night. I am about to try a formula made up of several ingredients, including Gabapentin, that I have to have made at a compounding pharmacy that will be topical. Hopefully that gives more relief, because currently I can hardly drive a car due to the extreme pain
366: Found this to work much better than any other anti depressants that I have tried over the years & i have tried several. I found it to give me much more energy than the others have but you definitely don't see or feel a difference for at least two weeks. I was worried in the beginning cause it didn't feel like it was working at all & actually made me feel more tired & for some reason I just kept yawning constantly the first two weeks of taking it but doctor said give it 2-3 weeks before giving up on it & she was right, after two weeks I felt the complete opposite, happy & energeticRead More Read Less
367: After getting this prescribed and not noticing any positive effects on my mood or energy levels, the psychiatrist suggested taking a higher dose and I have done so over the months up to 225mg. Even at that dosage I did not notice anything positive.   The negative effects were less energy and a slight reduction in getting stuff done (which was already at a low level). Also lost my sex drive completely and I started eating a lot less and lost 10kg quite quickly. These were things that were all managable.     The real problem started when I wanted to stop taking this, the withdrawal effects are horrible and make me feel physically sick. The brainzaps I am familiar with from withdrawing from citalopram and escitalopram and I can deal with fine. Bad nausea, diarrhea, insomnia, total exhaustion and flue like symptoms I am not familiar with and wish I knew about before even considering this drug. I have hot and cold flashes, I can't sleep for more than 2 hours at a time and wake up sweating, I am extremely irritated and restless. Taking the medication again gets rids of these symptoms quite quickly. Building down by halving the dosage all the way down to 37.5mg was not hard for me personally, but going down from that will require other drugs or me cutting open the pills and managing a lower dose through that.     All in all this is not a drug that I could recommend without people being made aware very clearly that it has severe withdrawal effects
368: to feel better
369: doctor failed to tell me of the difficulties involved in coming off this med and I failed to research myself - this drug is very hard to come off of even slowly - would not recommend this drug even for a short time. It was prescribed for relief of hot flashes and it worked minimally - not worth it!!!!!!!!
370: I hate this medication. The withdrawal symptoms are enough to push you off the edge.
371: Horrible experience for me. I took ONE PILL, the 37.5 mg dose as prescribed, for depression. Through the day I felt ok, maybe a little loopy, with some tension in the neck, slight headache, grinding of teeth. Went to sleep, then woke up in the middle of the night sweating profusely, extremely nauseas and hallucinating!! I had horrible, vivid thoughts, felt completely out of body and "compelled" to kill myself. It was the scariest thing I've ever experienced. I was not suicidal before taking this drug. The little sane part left in me stashed all sharp objects into a drawer and flushed the meds. I crawled into bed, shaking all over, sweating buckets and terrified. I won't even speak to my doctor again after this experience. Lifestyle changes and eastern herbal supplements have been far more effective. It was my first experience with antidepressants and hopefully my last.Read More Read Less
372: Please don’t touch this medication it’s horrible I couldn’t sleep, dizziness all day,weakness,inflammation all day long and night.
373: It is essential for my every day well-being...My mood is so much better in the mornings since it last over 24hrs...I don't wake up anxiety filled and I am able to function really well...It took less than a week to see a major difference...
374: started taking 37.5 mg a day for depression along with buspirone for my anxiety. just a small dose of this med made my depression 100x worse. within 2 weeks i became very suicidal, couldn’t stop crying, and almost checked myself into a hospital. i feel much better just a week after stopping. do not recommend.
375: My doc put me on Venlafaxine Oral after Lyrica and Cymbalta caused muscle pain and severe swelling of my ankles. I have very severe pain with Idiopathic Neuropathy, especially on my toes and end of both feet. On the other hand toes are very numb, but extremely sensitive to touch. Things I can no longer feel with my feet- if bath water is too hot, could not feel pain from five fire ant bites!, if wet on floor or carpet, I can't tell. Cut foot or bump- don't know it. But that little corn between my little toe and next one still hurts bad if not padded. The Venlafaxine works only a little, and I am religious to take it twice daily at same time. Doc finally gave me Lidocaine patches for severe pain days...that helps some too. I do not understand if so many people have this condition, why don't they have a good effective treatment for it. The pain has really effected my lifestyle. Can't go to the store anymore cause walking around is just too painful. Vacation to stroll around and look, no way. Entertaining clients in my work, doesn't happen any more. I hate this and my neurologist seems to not hear my complaints. Do I really have to use the wheelchair I recently bought to be able to go grocery shopping for the rest of my life? More research is needed to find an effective drug for this very painful and dangerous condition. Help!Read More Read Less
376: This drug does work for treating depression. However, if you miss one dose, you WILL get withdrawal effects. If I miss a dose, I notice dizziness, muscle spasms, and mood swings.  I wish my doctor would have tried a more mild medication instead of this stuff.
377: I have gotten great relife from this medication, the only thing that i dont like is; weight gain, if i forget to take it bad withdrawl symptoms, night sweats, tired all the time, and memory retension. I was on 150mg for a year and my Dr. up me to 225mg. The only diffrence with the higher dose is i feel hot most of the time. I have been on an Antidepressant for over 14 yrs and this one seems to be working. I dont like that im on such a high dose, but it is seems to be doing its job.
378: After taking Effexor XR for years, I was switched over to due to insurance making me.  After one week I was so achy (flu like symptoms). I am irritable and very jittery. Have been on the generic for 3 weeks and am extremely unhappy!  I will have to pay for the Effexor XR out of pocket now until I my fight with insurance company goes through (hopefully).  Not satisfied with the generic at all!!!
379: Life presented me with issues that caused me depression and anxiety and perhaps my own brain chemistry contributed.
After 15 or so years on Effexor, I decided that I did not need it anymore. My doctor did not do enough research into tapering off of this medication and suggested the wrong approach. and I had no idea what I was in for.
After 6 weeks of an incorrect taper, and after 5 days of stopping, I became mentally ill. I cried at everything and with anguish, had some euphoria and later on became very irritable. had serious brain fog. My body temperature would drop at night would shake, particularly my solar plexus. There is more to share but this is the worst of it. I stopped the drug 3-1/2 months ago and still have some symptoms. This has been a nightmare.Read More Read Less
380: I have been taking this medicine for about 2 weeks now, originally my doctor put me on it to help ease with my everyday stress. I haven't really noticed a difference in it yet. I'm still taking 37.5 mg of it right now but next week will go up to 75mg. With the different reviews on this I must say taking this medication doesn't seem to up my spirits especially at night. I find myself going to sleep at 9pm and sleeping til about 7am. I have been skipping meals due to no appetite so I think this drug may have different effects on people since most say they gained weight.Read More Read Less
381: Venlafaxine helped my depression at first. But when I lost my job, it actually made my depression worse. I couldnâ??t do anything but sleep all day. I had brain fog and increased negative self-talk. I became suicidal a couple of times. Thankfully I reported this to my doctor and she is now in the process of weaning me off. OMG itâ??s like night and day. The fog has lifted, I can think clearly, I have a much more positive outlook, I have way more energy. My recommendation is that if this drug works for you, great. But the minute it stops working, tell your doctor immediately because it could make it worse to the point of suicide
382: One year on and I am having terrible side effects e.g hair loss, loss of appetite, muscle weakness, shakes, fatigue
383: Ok, a little reality here: there were over 17 million prescriptions written for this medication in 2019. There are less than 500 reviews here. Secondly, it has been proven that the vast majority of people that post to these boards are dissatisfied. Satisfied users are much less likely to post. This medication has been proven to be one of the most effective treatments for major depression of all the antidepressants. And yes there are downsides for some people that aren’t able to handle the norepinephrine effects that come with the serotonin boost. And yes it is difficult to wean off of this drug. This is also not a “starter” antidepressant, there are others that are better to take at first such as Lexapro. However, for major depression, as a second line treatment for MDD, it has excellent results. Please get the facts and don’t be swayed by a few negative reviews. And no, I’m not affiliated with Effexor in any way, just a satisfied user.Read More Read Less
384: My doctor has me on a "Combo-Drug".  This Venlafaxine (75MG) and Sertraline (50MG.)  Together, they work great. My anxiety has greater diminished and panic disorder almost nil. I do fight sadness.
385: does nothing for hot flashes
386: After two other prescriptions left me tired and 'burned out', Venlafaxine helped me to get the energy to perform my daily tasks and get my life back. Effexor is also a covered Patient Assistance drug so I do not have to pay the high price which I cannot afford.
387: The first dose gave me diarrhea and urinary retention. My doctor prescribed it knowing that I am on propranolol. Now my heart is racing, I am sweaty and cannot pee. I will not continue taking this. Oh, it didn't change my level of pain at all.
388: An absolute life saver for me, literally.  I was suicidal.  I have taken this drug,often maximum dosage if very stressed, for twenty-one years.  Can say nothing against, never had side effects.  I will never stop taking this drug!  I am a male, aged 81.
389: The doctor put me on venlafaxine to replace my cymbalta (which I loved but very expensive even with insurance).  It did not work as well as Cymbalta.  He increased mg. it made everything worse as I was as taking nortripline and clonazepam. It was also getting to expensive to go to him. So I started removing myself off venfaxine. Reducing dosage very slowly.  I did nave some withdrawals but nothing with depression.  I have been off for a month now. I am a lot happier, and not as tired and sleeping all the time.  I know the nortripline is still there but the cost of it is not as bad as the other.  I think the cost was also adding to my problem and anxiety.  I am going to keep in touch with my GP as he knows what I been taking.  I hope I did not make a mistake taking myself off it but I don't feel like I did
390: This is not a medication you can just stop taking, i have tried many times. Seems even being weaned down to nothing, about 5-7 days later, i feel my world completely falls apart. I wish now i hadn't taken this, but it is effective.
391: I have been on this med for almost a year. I have made the mistake trusting my doctor and now I find out I should not have been taking this with another medication the same doctor perscribed. Maybe all the side effects as a result. I'm on a very high dose and afraid to stop and will have to wean off slowly.
392: My husband has been taking the Venlafaxine for a few years.  In all the reviews I read I did not see anyone talk about long term.  I did notice that some of the review talked about nausea, my husband actually vomits at least once a day.  He was also on another med for muscle spasm that he stopped due to the awful side effects.  During this time he would vomit at least 3-4 times a day.  has anyone else experienced actual vomitting and not just the nausea feeling.  Concerned as his appetite is absolutely nill at this point.Read More Read Less
393: I still feel sad but not a dark sad.  Thing is Iav gained over 30 pound and I cant find out why.My doctor doesnt seem to want to help me   I have hight blood pressure and colesteral and doing this resurch I dont even know if I should be taking this medication(vanlafaxine)it's a bit depressing
394: my mood is so much better and I am taking it for hot flashes .
395: I've been taking this for about 5 or 6 years and has made a great improvement. At least I don't want to go blow my head off anymore. Recently though I've been having some anxity problems, don't know if it's the medication or because I have a son in a war zone. Maybe both.Think I better have a disscussion with my Dr.
396: This drug is evil. I have been on 225mg for ten years and have suffered all of the side effects. I am desperate to come off it but even 24 hours of missing it and I become like a junkie - desperate to get my next dose so that I can function again. Sickness, upset stomach, dizziness, anxiety, mad mood swings and a complete lack of balance or coordination are what you have to look forward to coming off this stuff.
397: I have been on this medication before.  It helped to relieve me from severe anxiety and depression.  Recently I had eye surgery for a cataract.  The operation was a disaster and I lost my lens, the bag the lens fits in, and it damaged my retina.  I became so depressed I could hardly get out of bed.  I resumed taking Venlafaxine and the depression and anxiety begin to diminish.  Corrective surgery is scheduled for September 14, 2011.  After that, I will probably wean myself of this medication.  I also take citalopram once daily.Read More Read Less
398: I find this medication very effective. I have social anxiety disorder, depression, and extreme anxiety. I found that this medication has been the best out of all other the many meds I have been on for 12 years. My only complaints are the headachs and the sleeping problems it causes at first. I currently don't take it because I am pregnant and I can really tell the difference in my attitude and mood (not caused by the pregnancy). I really wish I could take it so I can feel normal again.
399: I have become totally dependant on 150gms per day. Tried to reduce dosage by lowest possible level (even by cutting 37.5gm tablets in half) numerous times but my brain reacts severely - within hours if alternate day reduction used or within a few days if reduction over longer than alternate days. Withdrawal is so bad that my entire body becomes unable to function at all and all I can do is sleep or move around slowly. Symptoms of depression seem to return but I am convinced this is due to drug dependency. Doctors advise to remain dependent on the drug. My feelings are: 1.The drug has been progressively reducing the ability of my brain to function. 2. Since taking the drug, while I am generally happy and generally functioning well, the level of my brain activity and ability has reduced dramatically. I am not always able to think clearly. 3. My memory has become totally unreliable, to the point that I can be convinced a conversation never took place or that I did not receive information that had infact been given to me. I have tried to change to a different antidepressant but this has caused the same effects as a dosage reduction.Read More Read Less
400: Does Venlafaxine have nitrates in it?
401: dizziness
402: I dont think I could have functioned without it...It is amazing for hot flashes.works wonders..
403: Going into menopause, I had horrible hot flashes to the point that I could time them--sometimes every 15 minutes.  This disrupted my workday and was difficult to manage.  My doctor advised me that Venlafaxine, used to treat depression and anxiety, was very successful treating hot flashes.  I am so happy with this, and it also helps with some of my anxiety symptoms.  I do not like to take medication unless absolutely necessary.  My life has improved 100 percent, thanks to Venlafaxine.
404: I've only been taking this for two weeks, but I feel so much better.  No more crying spells and i feel happy.  My family has noticed a big difference in my mood.
405: I was on Effexor XR for almost 4 years. It worked well to reduce my depression symptoms. I did notice a great reduction in my sex drive, major weight gain, "brain-zaps" if I missed a day or two w/flu-like symptoms. I just started the generic brand in hopes of reviving my "drive." I felt alittle sick to my stomach the 2nd day I took it, but so far it seems to be working. My dose was cut in half-from 75mg to 35.5mg. I'm hoping to drop some weight too.
406: I started this medication after unsuccessfully using 5-6 others. It works but there are many side effects.  About 2 years after starting it, I had to start taking high blood pressure medication. My heart has developed a murmur. And now, after over 10 years, my hands shake. I suppose there will be more along the way.  My depression is there but it no longer takes over my life. I have had to learn good coping techniques. If I stay up past midnight, some hyper something happens and I am up all night. I can tell when I have missed a dose but take a pill right away when that happens and the symtoms go away. The worst side effect has been a slowly worsening loss of memory and that started day one.   I will probably take this the rest of my life. I hate it but it makes me able to live a life
407: This is the drug from hell. Does very little good and causes so many withdrawal problems.  I stayed on the drug for 20 years not because I needed it but because withdrawal was so hard. After stopping, other issues my doctor was treating me for (with other pills) magically went away. No more tiredness, dizzyness when missing a dose. I was able to maintain my blood pressure without multiple pills.
408: I HAVE A COMMENT AND A QUESTION FOR OTHER READERS. I HAVE TAKEN EFFEXOR XR AND HAVE BEEN VERY, VERY SATISFIED. HOWEVER, I AM ABOUT TO LOOSE MY COVERALGE AND NEED TO CONVERT TO THE GENERIC VENLAFAXINE. HAS ANYONE CHANGED FROM EFFECOR TO THE GENERIC? ANY NOTICABLE DIFFERENCES? PLEASE ADVISE. THANK YOU.
409: I have been on effexor xr for awhile before being switched to venlafaxine. It seemed to be okay for about a month or so. I am an active full time college student that is always doing something. Now after being on venlafaxine for a month, I can barely get out of bed, stomach is always upset/gurgling, joint pains, tiredness, weakness, and depression has spiraled to an all time high.. Oh, my wife and I were on the same meds (for generalized anxiety), and Im waiting on word from the doctor because she is having massive headaches along with the above reactions I am having. Yay for insurance companies to sacrifice our health for a generic to save money...Read More Read Less
410: My psychiatrist gave this to me for my depression.  I often jolted awake from my sleep while taking it, and those spasms got worse as the early morning progressed.  I often felt tired even if I slept okay.  It increased my appetite and gave me flashes of lightheadedness.  It didn’t help my depression much.  I felt kinda anxious, and at most I felt emotionless, not happy.  So I didn’t stay on it long.  Keep in mind, though, that fifteen antidepressants have failed me, so I have a very stubborn case of it.Read More Read Less
411: This just does not work for me. My depression has gotten worse. My paranoia is worse also now. I get terriable headaches,cant sleep even with my sleeping meds,angry all the time,and i hate to go out in public. Just be careful taking this medication.
412: I HAVE NOT HAD GOOD RESULTS WITH THIS TAKING THIS MEDICATION!
413: I've been on it for 7 years and I'm happy with it. My life has changed and I would highly recommend it to everyone with depression, anxiety and social phobias.
414: I am suffering from PTSD and my wife has Lung cancerand i have ben really depressed for the last few weeks and before tht 47 years from ptsd, it has helped me remain the sam personality  and not sad all the time or feeling sorry for my self.I have been having one thing right aftr another and this last sunday my first born My daughter passed away, I really need omething to hold me togetherbut i have not slept in about a week my doasge has been increased from 150 per day
415: without this drug I will pick voice fights with people. I had no interested in life. now I have more things I want do not enough time.
416: I took Effexor XR for 5 yrs and it worked great. Then started the generic venlafaxine ER. For weeks I was nauseated, sleepy, dizzy, and having headaches, this is the ONLY medication I take. So I can not tell you if it has helped my depression because I have been too sick to tell, because I am either having horrible headaches, vomiting, or I am asleep, not happy that is for sure. Called my dr today and she called in a prescription for the Effexor XR and not to allow generic.
417: I have been taking this medication for almost two years now and have found great success taking it. started out on a low dose then moved to a high dose and hopefully will be medication free one day
418: After just 3 days on this low dose of 25mg I felt the anxiety leave me. Although, I noticed that now I have high blood pressure. Not sure if its related. I've been on this medication for one week now. I also only have one kidney, I was told it was okay. I will do lab work later to determine if all my numbers are fine.
419: i understand that not every antidepressant is guaranteed to give you relief, but i can't overstate how much worse venlaflaxine made my condition. I was on it for about a month. The side effects were tolerable, but a little frustrating. The sexual side effects were particularly bad. However, venlaflaxine triggered deep suicidal ideation that progressed until I had to be hospitalized. I felt like I was going crazy on it. It pushed me into a state of heavy derealization and confusion, and I couldn't even tell that it was this med causing the bulk of it until i survived the withdrawal symptoms. I had to be monitored closely while tapering. Now that I'm off of it, I feel relief. Although my depression isn't treated just yet, I'm not living in a complete nightmare. All I can advise you to do is be careful with venlaflaxine. I've heard stories of it ruining lives, and now I understand how.Read More Read Less
420: It has helped my depression.
421: Was having difficulty swallowing and tightness in the throat which would lead to panic attacks.  Didn't think I was depressed so wasn't sure if this was the drug for me, after about 8 weeks it all but went away.  Noticeable side affects at the beginning was jolts of electricity, some dizziness when standing up abruptly, and inability to ejaculate (though I'd say that pleased the wife with longer sessions, slowly went back to notrmal).  Caught the flu and an infection once, didn't heed the warning of stopping it cold turkey, but felt I shouldn't be taking tylonel, motrion, antibiotics, AND this pill all at once, after about 2 days the pain you get from body aches during the the flu was getting BAD and I doubled up on tylonel and motrin together thinking it was the flu getting worse and didnt do ANYTHING to the body pains, took half a dose of this and it all went away in 30 mins, woops. Gained weight, but I'd attribute it to not having any more swallowing issues.  Read More Read Less
422: Around when I was making the transition from high school to college, my anxiety got significantly worse. The main "symptoms" were fairly frequent intrusive thoughts and panic attacks. My doctor first had me try Venlafaxine. It sucked in my personal experience. It completely sapped me of all my energy to the point that I just wanted to stay in bed all day and it made me feel depressed every now and then. That was still within the first week or two of starting the medication, so take that with a grain of salt. I brought those side effects up to my doctor, and he promptly had me switch to Zoloft, which has worked wonderfully so far.Read More Read Less
423: took for 5 years.bad side effects. withdrawal effects when missing dose for even a few hours.Now just weened off of it but still Horrible withdrawal symptoms.Brain shivers ,the worst!!!!
424: This is a great drug, but the weight gain is what is "eating" at me now; have become pre-diabetic, blood pressure is high.  Ugh!
425: I have been taking this now for 1yr as I couldn't cope with my husbands death. I have found it extremely good as it helps me get along one day at a time without being a complete wreck.
426: I have taken this medication for over 10 years.  I feel emotions, and I feel in control of these.  I am pleased to be able to enjoy my life owing much to this medicine.
427: I feel like myself again, happier, lighter mood.  Medication took effect quickly.  A few mild side effects; nausea, loss of appetite, drowsy, yawning, blurry vision.  The side effect that is the most disappointing is the lack of sexual sensitivity.
428: I take this drug for mirgraines.. I took it once two days ago and I haven't slept since. I took it at night and I got up in the morning and my eyes were all pupuls, I was shaky and weak, and I couldn't focus. But, I was extremely happy. I'm extremely tired.. I can't wait to sleep again.
429: Even though it is generic, its still rather expensive.  After an initial adjustment period to the medication I now have very few side effects-the only one is that I sweat more than I used to
430: Has really helped with my depression when paired with other medications. However, the side effects with sexual dysfunction are difficult. The withdrawal effects are harsh. Overall, worth the bad things as it help me.
431: Worse experience of my life!!! Unable to function.. Horrible I have never had a problem with effexor and this venlafaxine has totally messed me up.
432: I have a question for other people taking this medication.  I am taking two 37.5 mg tablet daily.  My side effects are nausea and light headedness.  Lately I have become extremely tired (sleeping 15 to 20 hours per day) and have developed a rash on my legs.  Seems odd since I have been on this dose for four months. Has anyone else had a similar experience.  I don't know if this is a latent side effect, or some other cause I should be looking in to.
433: I took this drug (75 mg) once a day for apx. 60 days or less when bruising appeared on my legs and then my arms.  I quit the drug with no consequences and the bruising disappeared leaving black marks where they had been.  One was 2" long and 5" wide on my thigh.  It took almost 9 months for these marks to disappear. I have filed a complaint with the FDA.  If it caused bruising I wonder what it was doing inside?
434: I had been with a psychiatrist for nine years.  I suffered from severe depression and anxiety.  He tried a variety of anti-depressants all from the same family.  The last medication was Lexapro.  He kept me on this medication for six months even though adjusting the dosage had no effect on relieving my depression.  He did not keep up with research and was disorganized.  In May 2012, I decided to change psychiatrists.  Two people referred me to a new psychiatrist.  I contacted her office in May 2012 and was put on a waiting list.  I finally began seeing her in early June 2012.  She told me there were a variety of medications that we could try.  She adjusted my medications, but the most important change she made was to put me on the generic for Effexor ER which she told me was from a different family of anti-depressants.  Within three months, I began to feel better.  Now 13 months later, I feel very well and glad to be alive.  I no longer to to bed early and stay in bed in the morning.  I get up early (I was an early riser for most of my life.)  I am happily engaged in many activities and look forward to each new day.  I know that life presents problems for all of us but that I have the skills and new confidence to tackle them.  I know that I must not stop taking Effexor ER and that I must remain on medications for the rest of my life.  I will continue to see this excellent psychiatrist.  She is very organized.  She has a computer on her desk which she uses to keep up with research, detail her patients' records, submit claims to Medicare or insurance companies, and order electronically most of my medications from my pharmacy.  Effexor XR has been effective for me.Read More Read Less
435: I have worked with my family practitioner and neurologist trying to find an effective combination of antidepressant drugs.   I continue to feel very depressed on the inside, but outwardly I think I pull of a pretty good cover.   It's as if there are no other options.   I suffer from epilepsy (controlled with meds for 18 yrs.) and migraine headaches.   I do believe that there is a huge difference in some of the name brand drugs and generic drugs with regard to effectiveness, but pharmacists, my doctors and insurance company continually state that all these drugs have the same active ingredients and one is just as effective as the other, but at lower costs; I disagree.  I think it has more to do with money than my actual well being.   I've complained for years of low libido and increased weight (about 75 lbs. over the last 10 years) and no one seems interested in assisting me with these problems.   Yet, if I complained of chest pain, you can bet, I'd get all kinds of tests to get to the bottom of that problem.  Depression, over eating, lack of exercise - "you just need to eat better and get out there and exercise" Wow~ I never thought of that.....!  How do you get doctors to take your concerns seriously?  Read More Read Less
436: I switched from Prozac to Effexor XR about 3 weeks ago. Prozac was making me feel angry and annoyed. So far, the only issues I have had with Effexor XR are trouble sleeping, feeling tired during the day and being extra sweaty. ( at night mostly ) My mood has def. improved. I don't feel annoyed like I did with Prozac. I'm not snapping at people like I was.   I was reluctant to use Effexor due to some of the negative reviews I read but since I had success last year using Cymbalta   ( which is similiar to Effexor but more expensive ) I figured it was worth trying.   I'm taking Effexor to help deal with a sick spouse and work stress
437: Decreased depression improved mood. Decreased anxiety. Improved energy and general daily functioning
438: Only 4 days on drug, but so far, very good!!
439: without this I was severely suicidal. Now I have normal emotions. I have been saved by this simple pill.
440: good medication, not a lot of side effects, has worked well for me.
441: I was hoping this would be the medication to help me but after two doses I've experienced very bad side effects. My heart is pounding out of my chest, I'm incredibly restless, my hands have been shaking so badly it's difficult to type and I'm now very sensitive to loud noises. I see the dr. tomorrow this stinks, I was really hoping this one would work but the heart pounding scares me too much to continue it.
442: has helped with my depression
443: I'm taking 75mg capsule 1x daily for depression. 
I have IBS, after a few days starting this it really made my intestines grumble worse and I felt nauseated all the time. It was recommended that I carefully split the capsule open and take half which would bring me to 39.5 mg dosage. I continued this for a month and then brought it back to the normal 75 mg dosage which is worked out fine.

I recently tried to wean down off of it (not by choice, it was impossible to get a hold of my doctor) I had awful side effects...mostly the wave of anxiety...talking, moving around would make it come on worse. 
And not sleeping and racing thoughts all over the place.
Then my depression came back with a vengeance.  I got irritable and just was going down a bad path.. I am now with a better doctor and I almost feel like myself again. Still working on my anxiety, but my depression has greatly improved! I'll stay on this dosage... I know it affects people differently, but for me at this time in my life it seems to be okay. Nothing's perfect ??

Read More Read Less
444: Please note it takes a long time for these types of medication to work effectively. At first you may feel different, but it personally took 2 years to change my behavior to the point that it was clear: this drug has changed me for the better.

I take it for social anxiety, and general anxiety. I would often stay home on weekends, fearing social interaction. Even just going out into public would cause me anxiety. I would never leave my house unless I showered and looked good. Now, I can go about my errands all messy without showering, as I prefer to shower before seeing friends/ a date etc. 

Intrusive anxious thoughts have decreased 90% at least. I no longer ruminate thoughts due to my OCD either. I highly recommend trying this drug if you are extremely anxious. For my depression, Abilify was the answer.

Withdrawals of these meds are very intense - NEVER stop this class of meds cold turkey. The 1-star reviews of people going through withdrawals should not be discounted, however the intention is not to have withdrawals. If used properly, this should not a factor. It was never an issue for me as I take my medication consistently, as prescribed. Missing 1 day will not trigger crazy withdrawals.Read More Read Less
445: I have been on this medication for about a month.It has reduced my depression and anxiety.I was on Zolof for a number of years ,Then it stopped being effective.As far as side effects I have night sweats and now i a have a swollen & painful scrotum. Don't know if it is related as of now. Will check with Dr.
446: Many years ago no medications relieved my depression until I tried this one. I firmly believe it has saved my life. It is the only drug that makes me feel "normal". Only complaint is the terrible withdrawals if I run out, which I am now careful not to do. Try this med...give it time to work. Keep your doctor informed. I am on the maximum strength. If you suffer from major depression I am confident it can save your life as well! Good luck and god bless.
447: it work great i was haveing painic attacks every day for 1 1/2 the 1st 2 week where tuff but 3 yrs now and still doing great at 75 mg xr doing great
448: I just started this medicine yesterday, but I have experienced mild headaches and a little bit of nausea, mild reactions to this medicine. But my hot flashes have been 99% better.
449: I took one pill with food and 3 hours later I became violently ill with vomiting and diarrhea
450: I am 27 and have been on Venlafaxine for only 4 days so far so not long enough to know if it will do what it's supposed to which I'm told would take 3-4 weeks. My doctor prescribed this for me because I lack any energy or ambition and all I want to do is sleep! Basically I've suddenly become lazy which I have NEVER been! In the last 4 days the only irritating side effect I've noticed is dry mouth but this is also a side affect of Suboxone which I have been on for 2 years. It's gotten a bit worse so probably a little of both. The only other side affect that I have noticed (and am certainly not complaining about) is the loss of appetite. I literally have eaten 3 meals in the last 4 days and have no hunger or urge to snack!! For me this is a blessing! I usually eat and get hungry all the time! I weigh 225lbs and am told that I am morbidly obese! So perhaps this will work as a weight loss alternative? We'll see! I will repost when it kicks in and let you know how it works for me!Read More Read Less
451: It works well for me but I still have major episodes from time to time. But the withdrawal is horrible, it felt like I was dying.ngl
452: I have taken this for 1 year for hot flashes and it has worked great for me.My experience with this drug has been very good.I can't take HRT, cus of family history of Breast Cancer.
453: I was initally prescribed Effexor going from 37.5 eventually up to 150.  Because of the cost, I quit.....DR then gave me a script for Venlafaxine but I find I'm not as alert as I was on Effexor and I tend to nap in the afternoons now, where I didn't before.
454: I'm not sure if 37.5 mg of Effexor actually helped me, and I was on it for years. I take it with Wellbutrin. Well, I'm an artist, and began to struggle with creative block--so my doctor recommended that we taper off the Effexor. (He assured me that it has an effect on creativity) I'm taking 25mg for 30 days, then will take 12.5mg for 30 days before stopping completely. I'm nervous about this, because I get withdrawal symptoms within just an hour of missing my dose. Brain zaps are NO. JOKE. I've been crying a lot these past 2 days, and feel absolutely worthless. My husband and daughter are oblivious. I hope this sadness goes away
455: I've been taking it for about 5 years now and it has been a life saver for me. Only side effect now is the sweating, but what is that compared to how I was living before. Now I feel normal!!
456: Been on the drug for several months now and everytime I am unable to get my prescription on time I have unbearable dreams and excessive sweating. I recently missed two days in a row due to holiday shortened hours at my pharmacy and have had vertigo, nausea and vomiting for 48 hours. done taking this pill.
457: Been taking for about 2 years, now don't need.  Stopped taking it per my DR's instructions. Had very bad withdrawl problems, severe nausea,sweating,chills,can't sleep, muscle tension when sleeping. Been reducing doseage 3weeks, now none.Still can't sleep,sweating,chills,muscles tense when try to sleep and wakes me with pain-hands and legs all tight-cramped.Called DR today to see if anything can help. Will update later.
458: I have been on Effexor XR for many years. my DR> retired and I have been seeing the new Dr. that replaced her. She prescribed this drug for me and I have had terrible results. I know it is the generic for Effexor,but believe me it doesn't do it for me. Terrible withdrawal  symptoms achy and tiredness. unable to cope with alot of things. My Dr. is putting me back on Effexor XR.
459: i fine this pill very usefull. i had in the past tied others that did not help. my hot my mood is better. and im able to cope better. and am a much happy person. . it been two weeks and i have see a great diffence in me. i have read some of the comment about this pill. i found some people have action to this pill. but people can have side affect from any med. so please beware that not not everyone have side affects. this drug has work wonderful for me
460: I have been on the 37.5 mg for 2 wks and the 75 mg. for 4 days.  Is there any chance i will experience the withdrawl sysmtoms I have read about?
461: I have been taking this for 2 months now, before I was taking Cymbalta which worked great for my anxiety and depression, but cost too much. The venlafaxine works too, but I have noticed that if a miss a dose,I get that brain zap. On the plus side I have lost 12 lbs and although I still remain very nauseous when I take it, after eating a small amount of food, I feel better. On the downside, I am unable to sleep as I did with the Cymbalta, and when I do sleep, I have these horrible nightmares that I never had before. It is like the medication is bringing all my fears and anxieties to life in my head each night. They are very scary, and I often awake with my heart pounding and feeling very anxious but that goes away when I see that I am safe. Has anyone else experienced this? Read More Read Less
462: I was on Wellbutrin before this and I took myself off of it because I hated it. When I started this medication I noticed that my symptoms have improved greatly and I feel like I am a totally different person. I have lost weight on this because I don't resort to food as a comfort. I also have noticed that I sweat a little more than before but overall I would not change the way I feel for something as little as that.
463: This is absolutely the worst medication ever invented. After taking effexor for over a month and never being able to get out of bed, I weaned myself off of it. Two weeks later I am still experiencing crippling brain shivers, a side effect of stopping this drug. I am much worse off than before.
464: anxious, lack of communication control.  tend to say things that if reasoned would recognize perceived offensive behavior.  i have a twin sister who has had problems  with this  until she got medicine.
465: No one told me that by discontinuing this drug I would be way worse off than I started. Not a physical withdrawal, sure, but I thought I was literally going insane. I'm off it now and will make sure I ASK the dr before I ever take another thing.
466: I am 53 yrs old and was having mild depression and also hot flashes. My Doctor said it has worked for some with hot flashes and she was right. Instead of having them several times a day, I now have maybe one per week.
467: im taking this drug for fibromyalgia. i have only been on it for 2 weeks i missed 2 doses and got a major headache. but it does work and unlike the other medicines drs have tried on me it doesnt make me wanna puke every 5min
468: This medication has caused me to have numerous extremely severe side effects, such as, increased agitation, hostility, aggression, counting over n over again n my head, inability to urinate, etc. I talked to my psychiatrist and he said it was my Adderall and i tried and tried to tell him that it did NOT start until he put me on the Effexor XR 150 mg cap once daily, instead of the 75mg caps bid. He wouldnt listen and he decreased my Adderall significantly and NOW i am having EXTREME problems!!!!
469: When this medicine said 'do not drive or operate heavy machinery', they mean it. On the first day of the medicine, not only was I dizzy, but I forgot how to read for 5 seconds. Not that good of a thing to happen on the highway.  Earlier that day, I tried to set my digital alarm clock to wake me up, and granted I couldn't fall asleep, when I looked over at my desired 'wake up' time, i noticed why the thing didn't go off--I was still in the settings! There was many incidences that lead to 'moments' tied to this medicine, because I had even asked my brother what batteries a printer took to receive remote access functions. Sadly this is one medicine that won;t so much fix your (problem) as it would make you forget everything else and turn it into unbearable frustration. Here, normally, people come to me for help, and this medicine made me forget the names of the people I live with---even my own husband! I think you should consult your doctor on a trial before taking this medicine, because i'm certainly going to... if I remember to call him tomorrow, since I forgot to today.Read More Read Less
470: I had suffered from dysthymia since i was 14. At the age of 20 i went to seek help for my condition. Been taking diffrent types of SSRI for one yearand Due to many side effects i was put on venlafaxine 150 mg.  After a while my life became wonderful.   I was flourishing and most of my bad feelings just went away. My self esteem went up. I felt normal, woke up every morning with good energies. First time for years i was happy.actually happy. Thats been the best days at my life.   And then everything deteriorated as i decided to stop. First i was put on 75 mg, after that 37.5 mg. It was very hard quitting this drug. My dysthymia came back.  Been feeling bad for 1 year after i quit, so i decided to take this drug, that changed my life, again.   But it didn't work. I guess im thankful for this drug for breaking my illness. This drug actually stopped my dysthymia for a while. After seeing it didnt work,Been trying diffrent types of snri,ssri, vitamins, b12 supplys but none of them worked. Im desperate.  Read More Read Less
471: I can stress enough that this drug should be a LAST RESORT. The withdrawals are horrible, and the multitude of people stating such are not lying. I was warned about the withdrawals by my psychologist, so I asked my Dr that was prescribing this med. She said the withdrawal horror stories were not true - WRONG. She has never taken this drug - the stories are true. I was only on it for 2 months (it made me much much worse, not better) and am currently going through the withdrawal (day 4). It's absolutely awful, fatigue, nausea, diarrhea, suicidal thoughts, anxiety, wanting to cry for no reason out of nowhere (I'm a 6'1" 215lb man!). Some people may have no other choice but I would exhaust ALL OTHER OPTIONS before allowing yourself to be put on this stuff. Eventually you will need to get off, and the longer your on it the harder that gets. I am only posting this to hopefully save a few other people from what I am going through. Everyone is different, but scour the internet, you pretty much can't find ANYONE that stopped this stuff and didn't have issues. And you can always find someone that says they didn't have a problem coming off a med, I have yet to find one with Venlafaxine (Effexor).Read More Read Less
472: I am taking this medication for fibromyalgia. it works great for pain control and increasing energy level. I have been taking it for over a year. what i have realized is....this medication makes me angry and aggressive in stressful situations. if i feel that i am being threatened by someone, i become angry and want to hurt someone. it also increases my blood pressure and heart rate.
473: The only way I notice effexor is when I don't take it. It takes about 24 to 36 hours to start feeling something like jolts or shocks through my body. I was on 75mg now down to the 37mg now i'm going off of it. I'm sure many people could benefit from this drug unfortunately I am not one of you. I truly hate thinking/believing a pill can solve my problems without me having to get my hands dirty so to speak. Thats what counseling is for. I have never hoped for a miracle pill I just want something that can kick me out of that funk. So i'm not upset that this drug didn't change my life. This drug didn't give me a dulled or baseline feeling (no high highs or deep lows) which was what kept me on it for so long. Sometimes it hard to tell whats working and you don't want to stop taking it and find out it was doing the lion's share of the work. I would also caution everyone to take any review of (5 star or 1 star) from people within a week of treatment the placebo/expectation effect can be very misleading. I am only sharing this because I have been on it for a long period to explain its effects on me. extra info I'm 30 on lisinopril/hctz for high blood pressure. Ritalin 20mg. Bupropion 200mg. Hope someone finds this helpful. And I hope everyone finds something that helps you make it through the day.Read More Read Less
474: I have been taking this drug for 4 years straight and had to go off for about 3 months in 2011 and take the regular due to IPA Insurance not covering the drug. I could see a major difference in the two. I have to say this XR release is so much better and help most of the day to some extent.  It will make you sweat, LOL. But overall so far it has been working somewhat we are still working on getting other meds. I just worry of what it is doing to my organs though.
475: it's great for the treatment of my depression...but the side effects are a pain. especially if i run out and dont take it for a day or two...the brain shivers and the nausea are horrible.
476: I have been on a low dose of venlafaxine for several years now, and feel great.  Rarely do I suffer from any anxiety or feel down like I did in the past.
477: I still am quite depressed, sometimes I am really dispondent. I AM AFRAID TO ASK THE DOCTOR TO CHANGE THE DRUG AS I get horrible sensations in my head when it is coming up to the time when I take it, as if I am getting withdraw symptoms. This happens especially if I am a little later taking it.
478: i just want to know what the side effects are?
479: The HORRIBLE side effects and the even worse WITHDRAWL make this medication absutely the worst pill I have ever experienced!   Being on the drug is BAD...getting off is WORSE!    I cannont see any situation in which I would recommened Venlafaxine!    AVIOD AT ALL COSTS!!!!
480: I take this for fibromyalgia. It alleviates some of my symptoms, but I yawn a lot.
481: I'm on 75mg per day. I lost my appetite for the first week had so much energy. I didn't know I could be so energetic! My anxiety is calmer. I find my harmons are balaced. However, several months pass weight gain, no control on what I eat. I notice I don't cry on commercials no more. I feel like I lost my feel to feel for someone and no sex drive.
482: I have taken this medication for 1 month now. Apart from the constant yawning, a noted side effect, this medication is very good. I have dramatically cut back on my mood swings. My shyness is starting to subside also.
483: I am writing this for my roommate.  He has been having even more severe anxiety/depression the last few months so he went to the dr and got this med.  Every single day he eats before taking and still feels sick to his stomach.  He wakes up every morning with a severe headache.  And I've noticed that he's been staying up really late at night and then sleeping really late into the day, which he didn't do before.      From what I've read and what I've seen, I would say this medication apparently works for some, but the majority of the time it's just a waste.  Read More Read Less
484: This medication has helped me tremendously, but the feeling of burning inside my skin is driving me crazy . What other Mede could I take that would not me me seemly or feeling hot.  I have taken  prozack, but I don't feel like myself. Is effexor better than the generic drug?
